Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 2. PUBLIC EDUCATION

SUBTITLE G. SAFE SCHOOLS

CHAPTER 38. HEALTH AND SAFETY

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 38.001. IMMUNIZATION; REQUIREMENTS; EXCEPTIONS. (a) Each student shall be fully immunized against diphtheria, rubeola, rubella, mumps, tetanus, and poliomyelitis, except as provided by Subsection (c).

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 43 (H.B. 1098), Sec. 1

(b) Subject to Subsections (b-1) and (c), the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission may modify or delete any of the immunizations in Subsection (a) or may require immunizations against additional diseases as a requirement for admission to any elementary or secondary school.

Text of subsection as amended by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 94 (H.B. 1059), Sec. 2

(b) Subject to Subsection (c), the Department of State Health Services may modify or delete any of the immunizations in Subsection (a) or may require immunizations against additional diseases as a requirement for admission to any elementary or secondary school.

(b-1) Each year, the Department of State Health Services shall prepare a list of the immunizations required under this section for admission to public schools and of any additional immunizations the department recommends for school-age children. The department shall prepare the list in English and Spanish and make the list available in a manner that permits a school district to easily post the list on the district's Internet website as required by Section 38.019.

(c) Immunization is not required for a person's admission to any elementary or secondary school if the person applying for admission:

(1) submits to the admitting official:

(A) an affidavit or a certificate signed by a physician who is duly registered and licensed to practice medicine in the United States, in which it is stated that, in the physician's opinion, the immunization required poses a significant risk to the health and well-being of the applicant or any member of the applicant's family or household; or

(B) an affidavit signed by the applicant or, if a minor, by the applicant's parent or guardian stating that the applicant declines immunization for reasons of conscience, including a religious belief; or

(2) is a member of the armed forces of the United States and is on active duty.

(c-1) An affidavit submitted under Section (c)(1)(B) must be on a form described by Section 161.0041, Health and Safety Code, and must be submitted to the admitting official not later than the 90th day after the date the affidavit is notarized.

(d) The Department of State Health Services shall provide the required immunization to children in areas where no local provision exists to provide those services.

(e) A person may be provisionally admitted to an elementary or secondary school if the person has begun the required immunizations and if the person continues to receive the necessary immunizations as rapidly as is medically feasible. The Department of State Health Services shall adopt rules relating to the provisional admission of persons to an elementary or secondary school.

(f) A person who has not received the immunizations required by this section for reasons of conscience, including because of the person's religious beliefs, may be excluded from school in times of emergency or epidemic declared by the commissioner of public health.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 198, Sec. 2.160, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 43 (H.B. 1098), Sec. 1, eff. May 8, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 94 (H.B. 1059), Sec. 2, eff. May 15, 2007.

Sec. 38.002. IMMUNIZATION RECORDS; REPORTING. (a) Each public school shall keep an individual immunization record during the period of attendance for each student admitted. The records shall be open for inspection at all reasonable times by the Texas Education Agency or by representatives of local health departments or the Texas Department of Health.

(b) Each public school shall cooperate in transferring students' immunization records to other schools. Specific approval from students, parents, or guardians is not required before transferring those records.

(c) The Texas Education Agency and the Texas Department of Health shall develop the form for a required annual report of the immunization status of students. The report shall be submitted by all schools at the time and in the manner indicated in the instructions printed on the form.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 38.0025. DISSEMINATION OF BACTERIAL MENINGITIS INFORMATION. (a) The Department of State Health Services shall prescribe procedures by which each school district shall provide information relating to bacterial meningitis to its students and their parents each school year. The procedures must ensure that the information is reasonably likely to come to the attention of the parents of each student. The department shall prescribe the form and content of the information. The information must cover:

(1) the symptoms of the disease, how it may be diagnosed, and its possible consequences if untreated;

(2) how the disease is transmitted, how it may be prevented, and the relative risk of contracting the disease for primary and secondary school students;

(3) the availability and effectiveness of vaccination against and treatment for the disease, and a brief description of the risks and possible side effects of vaccination; and

(4) sources of additional information regarding the disease, including any appropriate office of the school district and the appropriate office of the department.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1187 (H.B. 3884), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2019.

(c) A school district, with the written consent of the Department of State Health Services, may provide the information required by this section to its students and their parents by a method different from the method prescribed by the department under Subsection (a) if the department determines that method would be effective in bringing the information to the attention of the parents of each student.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 219, Sec. 2, eff. May 22, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1187 (H.B. 3884), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1187 (H.B. 3884), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 38.003. SCREENING AND TREATMENT FOR DYSLEXIA AND RELATED DISORDERS. (a) Students enrolling in public schools in this state shall be screened or tested, as appropriate, for dyslexia and related disorders at appropriate times in accordance with a program approved by the State Board of Education. The program must include screening at the end of the school year of each student in kindergarten and each student in the first grade.

(b) In accordance with the program approved by the State Board of Education, the board of trustees of each school district shall:

(1) provide for the treatment of any student determined to have dyslexia or a related disorder; and

(2) adopt and implement a policy requiring the district to comply with all rules and standards adopted by the State Board of Education to implement the program, including:

(A) the Dyslexia Handbook: Procedures Concerning Dyslexia and Related Disorders, as adopted by the State Board of Education, and its subsequent amendments; and

(B) guidance published by the commissioner to assist the district in implementing the program.

(b-1) Unless otherwise provided by law, a student determined to have dyslexia during screening or testing under Subsection (a) or accommodated because of dyslexia may not be rescreened or retested for dyslexia for the purpose of reassessing the student's need for accommodations until the district reevaluates the information obtained from previous screening or testing of the student.

(c) Subject to Subsection (c-1), the State Board of Education shall adopt any rules and standards necessary to administer this section.

(c-1) The agency by rule shall develop procedures designed to allow the agency to:

(1) effectively audit and monitor and periodically conduct site visits of all school districts to ensure that districts are complying with this section, including the program approved by the State Board of Education under this section;

(2) identify any problems school districts experience in complying with this section, including the program approved by the State Board of Education under this section;

(3) develop reasonable and appropriate remedial strategies to address school district noncompliance and ensure the purposes of this section are accomplished; and

(4) solicit input from parents of students enrolled in a school district during the auditing and monitoring of the district under Subdivision (1) regarding the district's implementation of the program approved by the State Board of Education under this section.

(d) In this section:

(1) "Dyslexia" means a disorder of constitutional origin manifested by a difficulty in learning to read, write, or spell, despite conventional instruction, adequate intelligence, and sociocultural opportunity.

(2) "Related disorders" includes disorders similar to or related to dyslexia, such as developmental auditory imperception, dysphasia, specific developmental dyslexia, developmental dysgraphia, and developmental spelling disability.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 635 (S.B. 866), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1044 (H.B. 1886), Sec. 5, eff. June 15, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 450 (S.B. 2075), Sec. 3, eff. June 4, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 542 (H.B. 3928), Sec. 6, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 38.0031. CLASSROOM TECHNOLOGY PLAN FOR STUDENTS WITH DYSLEXIA. (a) The agency shall establish a committee to develop a plan for integrating technology into the classroom to help accommodate students with dyslexia. The plan must:

(1) determine the classroom technologies that are useful and practical in assisting public schools in accommodating students with dyslexia, considering budget constraints of school districts; and

(2) develop a strategy for providing those effective technologies to students.

(b) The agency shall provide the plan and information about the availability and benefits of the technologies identified under Subsection (a)(1) to school districts.

(c) A member of the committee established under Subsection (a) is not entitled to reimbursement for travel expenses incurred by the member under this section unless agency funds are available for that purpose.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 635 (S.B. 866), Sec. 4, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 38.0032. DYSLEXIA TRAINING OPPORTUNITIES. (a) The agency shall annually develop a list of training opportunities regarding dyslexia that satisfy the requirements of Section 21.054(b). The list of training opportunities must include at least one opportunity that is available online.

(b) A training opportunity included in the list developed under Subsection (a) must:

(1) comply with the knowledge and practice standards of an international organization on dyslexia; and

(2) enable an educator to:

(A) understand and recognize dyslexia; and

(B) implement instruction that is systematic, explicit, and evidence-based to meet the educational needs of a student with dyslexia.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1044 (H.B. 1886), Sec. 6, eff. June 15, 2017.

Sec. 38.004. CHILD ABUSE REPORTING AND PROGRAMS. (a) The agency shall develop a policy governing the reports of child abuse or neglect, including reports related to the trafficking of a child under Section 20A.02(a)(5), (6), (7), or (8), Penal Code, as required by Chapter 261, Family Code, for school districts, open-enrollment charter schools, and their employees. The policy must provide for cooperation with law enforcement child abuse investigations without the consent of the child's parents if necessary, including investigations by the Department of Family and Protective Services. The policy must require each school district and open-enrollment charter school employee to report child abuse or neglect, including the trafficking of a child under Section 20A.02(a)(5) or (7), Penal Code, in the manner required by Chapter 261, Family Code. Each school district and open-enrollment charter school shall adopt the policy.

(a-1) The agency shall:

(1) maintain on the agency Internet website a list of links to websites that provide information regarding the prevention of child abuse; and

(2) develop and periodically update a training program on prevention of child abuse that a school district may use for staff development.

(b) Each school district shall provide child abuse antivictimization programs in elementary and secondary schools.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 561 (S.B. 1456), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 592 (S.B. 939), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 332 (H.B. 10), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 38.0041. POLICIES ADDRESSING SEXUAL ABUSE AND OTHER MALTREATMENT OF CHILDREN. (a) Each school district and open-enrollment charter school shall adopt and implement a policy addressing sexual abuse, sex trafficking, and other maltreatment of children, to be included in the district improvement plan under Section 11.252 and any informational handbook provided to students and parents.

(a-1) A school district may collaborate with local law enforcement and outside consultants with expertise in the prevention of sexual abuse and sex trafficking to create the policy required under Subsection (a), and to create a referral protocol for high-risk students.

(b) A policy required by this section must address:

(1) methods for increasing staff, student, and parent awareness of issues regarding sexual abuse, sex trafficking, and other maltreatment of children, including prevention techniques and knowledge of likely warning signs indicating that a child may be a victim of sexual abuse, sex trafficking, or other maltreatment, using resources developed by the agency or the commissioner regarding those issues, including resources developed by the agency under Section 38.004;

(2) actions that a child who is a victim of sexual abuse, sex trafficking, or other maltreatment should take to obtain assistance and intervention; and

(3) available counseling options for students affected by sexual abuse, sex trafficking, or other maltreatment.

(c) The methods under Subsection (b)(1) for increasing awareness of issues regarding sexual abuse, sex trafficking, and other maltreatment of children must include training, as provided by this subsection, concerning prevention techniques for and recognition of sexual abuse, sex trafficking, and all other maltreatment of children, including the sexual abuse, sex trafficking, and other maltreatment of children with significant cognitive disabilities. The training:

(1) must be provided:

(A) in accordance with the policy adopted under Section 21.4515; and

(B) as part of a new employee orientation to all new school district and open-enrollment charter school employees; and

(2) must include training concerning:

(A) factors indicating a child is at risk for sexual abuse, sex trafficking, or other maltreatment;

(B) likely warning signs indicating a child may be a victim of sexual abuse, sex trafficking, or other maltreatment;

(C) internal procedures for seeking assistance for a child who is at risk for sexual abuse, sex trafficking, or other maltreatment, including referral to a school counselor, a social worker, or another mental health professional;

(D) techniques for reducing a child's risk of sexual abuse, sex trafficking, or other maltreatment; and

(E) community organizations that have relevant existing research-based programs that are able to provide training or other education for school district or open-enrollment charter school staff members, students, and parents.

(d) For any training under Subsection (c), each school district and open-enrollment charter school shall maintain records that include the district or charter school staff members who participated in the training.

(e) If a school district or open-enrollment charter school determines that the district or charter school does not have sufficient resources to provide the training required under Subsection (c), the district or charter school shall work in conjunction with a community organization to provide the training at no cost to the district or charter school.

(f) The training under Subsection (c) may be included in staff development under Section 21.451.

(g) A school district or open-enrollment charter school employee may not be subject to any disciplinary proceeding, as defined by Section 22.0512(b), resulting from an action taken in compliance with this section. The requirements of this section are considered to involve an employee's judgment and discretion and are not considered ministerial acts for purposes of immunity from liability under Section 22.0511. Nothing in this section may be considered to limit the immunity from liability provided under Section 22.0511.

(h) For purposes of this section, "other maltreatment" has the meaning assigned by Section 42.002, Human Resources Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1115 (H.B. 1041), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1323 (S.B. 471), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 443 (S.B. 715), Sec. 34, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 592 (S.B. 939), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 762 (S.B. 2039), Sec. 2, eff. June 12, 2017.

Reenacted and amended by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 303 (H.B. 111), Sec. 1, eff. May 31, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 17, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 38.0042. POSTING CHILD ABUSE HOTLINE TELEPHONE NUMBER. (a) Each public school and open-enrollment charter school shall post in a clearly visible location in a public area of the school that is readily accessible to students a sign in English and in Spanish that contains the toll-free telephone number operated by the Department of Family and Protective Services to receive reports of child abuse or neglect.

(b) The commissioner may adopt rules relating to the size and location of the sign required by Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 592 (S.B. 939), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 38.005. PROTECTIVE EYE DEVICES IN PUBLIC SCHOOLS. Each teacher and student must wear industrial-quality eye-protective devices in appropriate situations as determined by school district policy.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 38.006. E-CIGARETTES AND TOBACCO PRODUCTS ON SCHOOL PROPERTY. (a) In this section, "e-cigarette" has the meaning assigned by Section 161.081, Health and Safety Code.

(b) The board of trustees of a school district shall:

(1) prohibit smoking or using e-cigarettes or tobacco products at a school-related or school-sanctioned activity on or off school property;

(2) prohibit students from possessing e-cigarettes or tobacco products at a school-related or school-sanctioned activity on or off school property; and

(3) ensure that school personnel enforce the policies on school property.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 181 (S.B. 97), Sec. 38, eff. October 1, 2015.

Sec. 38.007. ALCOHOL-FREE SCHOOL ZONES. (a) The board of trustees of a school district shall prohibit the use of alcoholic beverages at a school-related or school-sanctioned activity on or off school property.

(a-1) This section does not apply to a performing arts facility leased to a nonprofit organization for an event as provided by Section 11.179.

(b) The board of trustees of a school district shall attempt to provide a safe alcohol-free environment to students coming to or going from school. The board of trustees may cooperate with local law enforcement officials and the Texas Alcoholic Beverage Commission in attempting to provide this environment and in enforcing Sections 101.75, 109.33, and 109.59, Alcoholic Beverage Code. Additionally, the board, if a majority of the area of a district is located in a municipality with a population of 1.3 million or more, may petition the commissioners court of the county in which the district is located or the governing board of an incorporated city or town in which the district is located to adopt a 1,000-foot zone under Section 109.33, Alcoholic Beverage Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 834 (H.B. 2633), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 644 (H.B. 4559), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 38.008. POSTING OF STEROID LAW NOTICE. Each school in a school district in which there is a grade level of seven or higher shall post in a conspicuous location in the school gymnasium and each other place in a building where physical education classes are conducted the following notice:

Anabolic steroids are for medical use only. State law prohibits possessing, dispensing, delivering, or administering an anabolic steroid in any manner not allowed by state law. State law provides that body building, muscle enhancement, or the increase of muscle bulk or strength through the use of an anabolic steroid or human growth hormone by a person who is in good health is not a valid medical purpose. Only a medical doctor may prescribe an anabolic steroid or human growth hormone for a person. A violation of state law concerning anabolic steroids or human growth hormones is a criminal offense punishable by confinement in jail or imprisonment in the Texas Department of Criminal Justice.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 25.050, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 38.009. ACCESS TO MEDICAL RECORDS. (a) A school administrator, nurse, or teacher is entitled to access to a student's medical records maintained by the school district for reasons determined by district policy.

(b) A school administrator, nurse, or teacher who views medical records under this section shall maintain the confidentiality of those medical records.

(c) This section does not authorize a school administrator, nurse, or teacher to require a student to be tested to determine the student's medical condition or status.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 38.0095. PARENTAL ACCESS TO MEDICAL RECORDS. (a) A parent or guardian of a student is entitled to access to the student's medical records maintained by a school district.

(b) On request of a student's parent or guardian, the school district shall provide a copy of the student's medical records to the parent or guardian. The district may not impose a charge for providing the copy that exceeds the charge authorized by Section 552.261, Government Code, for providing a copy of public information.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1418, Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 1999.

Sec. 38.010. OUTSIDE COUNSELORS. (a) A school district or school district employee may not refer a student to an outside counselor for care or treatment of a chemical dependency or an emotional or psychological condition unless the district:

(1) obtains prior written consent for the referral from the student's parent;

(2) discloses to the student's parent any relationship between the district and the outside counselor;

(3) informs the student and the student's parent of any alternative public or private source of care or treatment reasonably available in the area;

(4) requires the approval of appropriate school district personnel before a student may be referred for care or treatment or before a referral is suggested as being warranted; and

(5) specifically prohibits any disclosure of a student record that violates state or federal law.

(b) In this section, "parent" includes a managing conservator or guardian.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 38.0101. AUTHORITY TO EMPLOY OR CONTRACT WITH NONPHYSICIAN MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL. (a) A school district may employ or contract with one or more nonphysician mental health professionals.

(b) In this section, "nonphysician mental health professional" means:

(1) a psychologist licensed to practice in this state and designated as a health-service provider;

(2) a registered nurse with a master's or doctoral degree in psychiatric nursing;

(3) a licensed clinical social worker;

(4) a professional counselor licensed to practice in this state; or

(5) a marriage and family therapist licensed to practice in this state.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 1.12, eff. December 1, 2019.

Sec. 38.011. DIETARY SUPPLEMENTS. (a) A school district employee may not:

(1) knowingly sell, market, or distribute a dietary supplement that contains performance enhancing compounds to a primary or secondary education student with whom the employee has contact as part of the employee's school district duties; or

(2) knowingly endorse or suggest the ingestion, intranasal application, or inhalation of a dietary supplement that contains performance enhancing compounds by a primary or secondary education student with whom the employee has contact as part of the employee's school district duties.

(b) This section does not prohibit a school district employee from:

(1) providing or endorsing a dietary supplement that contains performance enhancing compounds to, or suggesting the ingestion, intranasal application, or inhalation of a dietary supplement that contains performance enhancing compounds by, the employee's child; or

(2) selling, marketing, or distributing a dietary supplement that contains performance enhancing compounds to, or endorsing or suggesting the ingestion, intranasal application, or inhalation of a dietary supplement that contains performance enhancing compounds by, a primary or secondary education student as part of activities that:

(A) do not occur on school property or at a school-related function;

(B) are entirely separate from any aspect of the employee's employment with the school district; and

(C) do not in any way involve information about or contacts with students that the employee has had access to, directly or indirectly, through any aspect of the employee's employment with the school district.

(c) A person who violates this section commits an offense. An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

(d) In this section:

(1) "Dietary supplement" has the meaning assigned by 21 U.S.C. Section 321 and its subsequent amendments.

(2) "Performance enhancing compound" means a manufactured product for oral ingestion, intranasal application, or inhalation that:

(A) contains a stimulant, amino acid, hormone precursor, herb or other botanical, or any other substance other than an essential vitamin or mineral; and

(B) is intended to increase athletic or intellectual performance, promote muscle growth, or increase an individual's endurance or capacity for exercise.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1086, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 38.012. NOTICE CONCERNING HEALTH CARE SERVICES. (a) Before a school district or school may expand or change the health care services available at a school in the district from those that were available on January 1, 1999, the board of trustees must:

(1) hold a public hearing at which the board discloses all information on the proposed health care services, including:

(A) all health care services to be provided;

(B) whether federal law permits or requires any health care service provided to be kept confidential from parents;

(C) whether a child's medical records will be accessible to the child's parent;

(D) information concerning grant funds to be used;

(E) the titles of persons who will have access to the medical records of a student; and

(F) the security measures that will be used to protect the privacy of students' medical records; and

(2) approve the expansion or change by a record vote.

(b) A hearing under Subsection (a) must include an opportunity for public comment on the proposal.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1418, Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 1999.

Sec. 38.013. COORDINATED HEALTH PROGRAM FOR ELEMENTARY, MIDDLE, AND JUNIOR HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS. (a) The agency shall make available to each school district one or more coordinated health programs in elementary school, middle school, and junior high school. Each program must provide for coordinating education and services related to:

(1) physical health education, including programs designed to prevent obesity, cardiovascular disease, oral diseases, and Type 2 diabetes and programs designed to promote the role of proper nutrition;

(2) mental health education, including education about mental health conditions, mental health well-being, skills to manage emotions, establishing and maintaining positive relationships, and responsible decision-making;

(3) substance abuse education, including education about alcohol abuse, prescription drug abuse, and abuse of other controlled substances;

(4) physical education and physical activity; and

(5) parental involvement.

(a-1) The commissioner by rule shall adopt criteria for evaluating a coordinated health program before making the program available under Subsection (a). Before adopting the criteria, the commissioner shall request review and comment concerning the criteria from the Department of State Health Services School Health Advisory Committee. The commissioner may make available under Subsection (a) only those programs that meet criteria adopted under this subsection.

(b) The agency shall notify each school district of the availability of the programs.

(c) The commissioner by rule shall adopt criteria for evaluating the nutritional services component of a program under this section that includes an evaluation of program compliance with the Department of Agriculture guidelines relating to foods of minimal nutritional value.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 907, Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 944, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 784 (S.B. 42), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 784 (S.B. 42), Sec. 4, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1399 (H.B. 2483), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 1.13, eff. December 1, 2019.

Sec. 38.014. IMPLEMENTATION OF COORDINATED HEALTH PROGRAM FOR ELEMENTARY, MIDDLE, AND JUNIOR HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS. (a) Each school district shall:

(1) participate in appropriate training for the implementation of the program approved by the agency under Section 38.013; and

(2) implement the program in each elementary school, middle school, and junior high school in the district.

(b) The agency, in cooperation with the Texas Department of Health, shall adopt a schedule for regional education service centers to provide necessary training under this section.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 907, Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 784 (S.B. 42), Sec. 5, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 784 (S.B. 42), Sec. 6, eff. June 17, 2005.

Sec. 38.0141. REPORTING OF CERTAIN HEALTH AND SAFETY INFORMATION REQUIRED. (a) Each school district shall provide to the agency information as required by the commissioner, including statistics and data, relating to student health and physical activity and information described by Sections 28.004(k)(2), (3), and (4) presented in a form determined by the commissioner. The district shall provide the information required by this subsection for the district and for each campus in the district.

(b) Not later than one year after the agency receives the information required by Subsection (a), the commissioner shall complete a report on physical education provided by each school district and publish the report on the agency's Internet website.

(c) The report must include:

(1) the number of physical education classes offered at each campus in the district and detail the number of days, classes, and minutes offered each week by each campus;

(2) the ratio of students enrolled in physical education classes in the district compared to the overall enrollment;

(3) the average physical education class size at each campus in the district;

(4) the number of physical education teachers in the district who are licensed, certified, or endorsed by an accredited teacher preparation program to teach physical education;

(5) whether each campus in the district has the appropriate equipment and adequate facilities for students to engage in the amount and intensity of physical activity required under Section 28.002;

(6) whether the district allows modifications or accommodations that allow physical education courses to meet the needs of students with disabilities; and

(7) whether the district has a policy that allows teachers or administrators in the district to withhold physical activity from a student as punishment.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 784 (S.B. 42), Sec. 7, eff. June 17, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1126 (S.B. 1873), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 3.02, eff. December 1, 2019.

Sec. 38.015. SELF-ADMINISTRATION OF PRESCRIPTION ASTHMA OR ANAPHYLAXIS MEDICINE BY STUDENTS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Parent" includes a person standing in parental relation.

(2) "Self-administration of prescription asthma or anaphylaxis medicine" means a student's discretionary use of prescription asthma or anaphylaxis medicine.

(b) A student with asthma or anaphylaxis is entitled to possess and self-administer prescription asthma or anaphylaxis medicine while on school property or at a school-related event or activity if:

(1) the prescription medicine has been prescribed for that student as indicated by the prescription label on the medicine;

(2) the student has demonstrated to the student's physician or other licensed health care provider and the school nurse, if available, the skill level necessary to self-administer the prescription medication, including the use of any device required to administer the medication;

(3) the self-administration is done in compliance with the prescription or written instructions from the student's physician or other licensed health care provider; and

(4) a parent of the student provides to the school:

(A) a written authorization, signed by the parent, for the student to self-administer the prescription medicine while on school property or at a school-related event or activity; and

(B) a written statement from the student's physician or other licensed health care provider, signed by the physician or provider, that states:

(i) that the student has asthma or anaphylaxis and is capable of self-administering the prescription medicine;

(ii) the name and purpose of the medicine;

(iii) the prescribed dosage for the medicine;

(iv) the times at which or circumstances under which the medicine may be administered; and

(v) the period for which the medicine is prescribed.

(c) The physician's statement must be kept on file in the office of the school nurse of the school the student attends or, if there is not a school nurse, in the office of the principal of the school the student attends.

(d) This section does not:

(1) waive any liability or immunity of a governmental unit or its officers or employees; or

(2) create any liability for or a cause of action against a governmental unit or its officers or employees.

(e) The commissioner may adopt rules and prescribe forms to assist in the implementation of this section.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 511, Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2001. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 38.013 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(19), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 10.01, eff. May 31, 2006.

Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 10.02, eff. May 31, 2006.

Sec. 38.0151. POLICIES FOR CARE OF CERTAIN STUDENTS AT RISK FOR ANAPHYLAXIS. (a) The board of trustees of each school district and the governing body or an appropriate officer of each open-enrollment charter school shall adopt and administer a policy for the care of students with a diagnosed food allergy at risk for anaphylaxis based on "Guidelines for the Care of Students With Food Allergies At-Risk for Anaphylaxis" developed by the commissioner of state health services under this section and updated by the commissioner of state health services in consultation with an ad hoc committee appointed by the commissioner of state health services as provided by Section 38.0152. The guidelines and any recommendation to update the guidelines regarding medical treatment or therapy must be scientifically valid.

(b) A school district or open-enrollment charter school shall annually review and, as necessary, revise its policy for the care of students with a diagnosed food allergy at risk for anaphylaxis to ensure the policy is consistent with the most current version of the guidelines described by Subsection (a).

(c) The guidelines described by Subsection (a) may not:

(1) require a school district or open-enrollment charter school to purchase prescription anaphylaxis medication, such as epinephrine, or require any other expenditure that would result in a negative fiscal impact on the district or charter school; or

(2) require the personnel of a district or charter school to administer anaphylaxis medication, such as epinephrine, to a student unless the anaphylaxis medication is prescribed for that student.

(d) This section does not:

(1) waive any liability or immunity of a governmental entity or its officers or employees; or

(2) create any liability for or a cause of action against a governmental entity or its officers or employees.

(e) The agency shall post the guidelines described by Subsection (a) on the agency's website with any other information relating to students with special health needs. The information posted by the agency must include a summary of the guidelines. The agency shall annually review and, as necessary, revise the summary and any other information to reflect the most current version of the guidelines.

(f) A school district or open-enrollment charter school that provides for the maintenance, administration, and disposal of epinephrine auto-injectors under Subchapter E is not required to comply with this section.

(g) Each school year, the board of trustees of each school district and the governing body of each open-enrollment charter school shall post a summary of the guidelines on the district's or school's Internet website, including instructions on obtaining access to the complete guidelines document. The district's or school's website must be accessible by each student enrolled in the district or school and a parent or guardian of each student. Any forms used by a district or school requesting information from a parent or guardian enrolling a child with a food allergy in the district or school must include information to access on the district's or school's Internet website a summary of the guidelines and instructions on obtaining access to the complete guidelines document.

(h) The guidelines described by Subsection (a) may not:

(1) require a school district or open-enrollment charter school to purchase treatments approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration or make any other expenditure that would result in a negative fiscal impact on the district or school; or

(2) require the personnel of a district or school to administer treatments approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration to a student unless the medication is prescribed for that student by the student's physician.

(i) This section does not:

(1) waive any liability or immunity of a school district or open-enrollment charter school or district or school officers or employees; or

(2) create any liability for or a cause of action against a school district or open-enrollment charter school or district or school officers or employees.

(j) Notwithstanding any other law, this section, including any information or materials developed under this section and the dissemination of information or materials developed under this section, does not create a civil, criminal, or administrative cause of action or liability or create a standard of care, obligation, or duty that provides the basis for a cause of action.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 590 (S.B. 27), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 180 (S.B. 66), Sec. 3, eff. May 28, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 975 (S.B. 869), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 38.0152. COMMITTEE TO ASSIST IN UPDATING GUIDELINES FOR CARE OF STUDENTS AT RISK FOR ANAPHYLAXIS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of state health services.

(2) "Department" means the Department of State Health Services.

(3) "Guidelines" means "Guidelines for the Care of Students With Food Allergies At-Risk for Anaphylaxis" on which school district and open-enrollment charter school policies for the care of students with a diagnosed food allergy at risk for anaphylaxis are based as provided by Section 38.0151.

(b) The commissioner shall appoint members to an ad hoc committee to consult with the commissioner on updating the current guidelines to incorporate and specifically reference any new food-allergy management best practices and treatments, including new methods, treatments, and therapies to reduce the risk of allergic reactions.

(c) The committee must include:

(1) not more than one representative from:

(A) the department; and

(B) the Texas Nurses Association;

(2) at least two individuals from one or more national patient advocacy organizations representing the interests of food allergies, anaphylaxis, and related medical issues, including asthma;

(3) one principal of a public elementary school campus at which one or more students with a diagnosed food allergy at risk for anaphylaxis are enrolled;

(4) one classroom teacher employed at a public elementary school campus at which one or more students with a diagnosed food allergy at risk for anaphylaxis are enrolled;

(5) one superintendent of a school district;

(6) one member of a board of trustees of a school district;

(7) one member of a governing body of an open-enrollment charter school;

(8) at least two parents of public school students with a diagnosed food allergy at risk for anaphylaxis;

(9) at least four physicians board certified in allergy and immunology by the American Board of Allergy and Immunology; and

(10) at least one physician board certified in general pediatrics by the American Board of Pediatrics who is a member of a statewide pediatric organization.

(d) Ad hoc committee members shall serve for a period determined by the commissioner. On the resignation of a member of the committee or the removal of a member from the committee by the commissioner, the commissioner shall appoint a new member to the committee who qualifies for the committee in the same manner that the member who resigned or is removed qualified.

(e) Section 2110.005, Government Code, does not apply to the ad hoc committee appointed under this section.

(f) Any recommendations on updating the current guidelines regarding medical treatment or therapies must be submitted by the physicians directly to the commissioner, provided that those recommendations may only be submitted to the commissioner if approved by a majority of the physicians serving on the committee.

(g) At least once every three years, the commissioner shall order a meeting of the committee to update the guidelines to incorporate any new food-allergy management best practices and treatments.

(h) The commissioner may order a meeting of the committee at any time the commissioner determines necessary for the committee to:

(1) discuss the protection of students with food allergies at risk for anaphylaxis; and

(2) update the guidelines.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 975 (S.B. 869), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 38.016. PSYCHOTROPIC DRUGS AND PSYCHIATRIC EVALUATIONS OR EXAMINATIONS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Nonphysician mental health professional" has the meaning assigned by Section 38.0101.

(2) "Parent" includes a guardian or other person standing in parental relation.

(3) "Psychotropic drug" means a substance that is:

(A) used in the diagnosis, treatment, or prevention of a disease or as a component of a medication; and

(B) intended to have an altering effect on perception, emotion, or behavior.

(b) A school district employee may not:

(1) recommend that a student use a psychotropic drug; or

(2) suggest any particular diagnosis; or

(3) use the refusal by a parent to consent to administration of a psychotropic drug to a student or to a psychiatric evaluation or examination of a student as grounds, by itself, for prohibiting the child from attending a class or participating in a school-related activity.

(c) Subsection (b) does not:

(1) prevent an appropriate referral under the child find system required under 20 U.S.C. Section 1412, as amended;

(2) prohibit a school district employee, or an employee of an entity with which the district contracts, who is a registered nurse, advanced nurse practitioner, physician, or nonphysician mental health professional licensed or certified to practice in this state from recommending that a child be evaluated by a physician or nonphysician mental health professional; or

(3) prohibit a school employee from discussing any aspect of a child's behavior or academic progress with the child's parent or another school district employee.

(d) The board of trustees of each school district shall adopt a policy to ensure implementation and enforcement of this section.

(e) An act in violation of Subsection (b) does not override the immunity from personal liability granted in Section 22.0511 or other law or the district's sovereign and governmental immunity.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1058, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 4.008, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 1.14, eff. December 1, 2019.

Sec. 38.017. AVAILABILITY OF AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATOR. (a) Each school district shall make available at each campus in the district at least one automated external defibrillator, as defined by Section 779.001, Health and Safety Code. A campus defibrillator must be readily available during any University Interscholastic League athletic competition held on the campus. In determining the location at which to store a campus defibrillator, the principal of the campus shall consider the primary location on campus where students engage in athletic activities.

(b) To the extent practicable, each school district, in cooperation with the University Interscholastic League, shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that an automated external defibrillator is available at each University Interscholastic League athletic practice held at a district campus. If a school district is not able to make an automated external defibrillator available in the manner provided by this subsection, the district shall determine the extent to which an automated external defibrillator must be available at each University Interscholastic League athletic practice held at a district campus. The determination must be based, in addition to any other appropriate considerations, on relevant medical information.

(c) Each school district, in cooperation with the University Interscholastic League, shall determine the extent to which an automated external defibrillator must be available at each University Interscholastic League athletic competition held at a location other than a district campus. The determination must be based, in addition to any other appropriate considerations, on relevant medical information and whether emergency services personnel are present at the athletic competition under a contract with the school district.

(d) Each school district shall ensure the presence at each location at which an automated external defibrillator is required under Subsection (a), (b), or (c) of at least one campus or district employee trained in the proper use of the defibrillator at any time a substantial number of district students are present at the location.

(e) A school district shall ensure that an automated external defibrillator is used and maintained in accordance with standards established under Chapter 779, Health and Safety Code.

(f) This section does not:

(1) waive any immunity from liability of a school district or its officers or employees;

(2) create any liability for or a cause of action against a school district or its officers or employees; or

(3) waive any immunity from liability under Section 74.151, Civil Practice and Remedies Code.

(g) This subsection applies only to a private school that receives an automated external defibrillator from the agency or receives funding from the agency to purchase or lease an automated external defibrillator. A private school shall:

(1) make available at the school at least one automated external defibrillator; and

(2) in coordination with the Texas Association of Private and Parochial Schools, adopt a policy concerning the availability of an automated external defibrillator at athletic competitions and practices in a manner consistent with the requirements prescribed by this section, including the training and maintenance requirements prescribed by this section.

(h) A school district may seek and accept gifts, grants, or other donations to pay the district's cost of purchasing automated external defibrillators required under this section.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1371 (S.B. 7), Sec. 6, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 38.018. PROCEDURES REGARDING RESPONSE TO CARDIAC ARREST. (a) Each school district and private school shall develop safety procedures for a district or school employee or student to follow in responding to a medical emergency involving cardiac arrest, including the appropriate response time in administering cardiopulmonary resuscitation, using an automated external defibrillator, as defined by Section 779.001, Health and Safety Code, or calling a local emergency medical services provider.

(b) A private school is required to develop safety procedures under this section only if the school receives an automated external defibrillator from the agency or receives funding from the agency to purchase or lease an automated external defibrillator.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1371 (S.B. 7), Sec. 6, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 38.0181. CARDIOVASCULAR SCREENING PILOT PROGRAM. (a) In this section, "pilot program" means the cardiovascular screening pilot program.

(b) The commissioner shall establish a pilot program under which sixth grade students at participating campuses are administered a cardiovascular screening, including an electrocardiogram and an echocardiogram.

(c) The commissioner shall select campuses to participate in the pilot program. In selecting campuses, the commissioner shall ensure that the cardiovascular screening is administered to an ethnically diverse range of students.

(d) The commissioner may accept grants and donations for use in administering the pilot program.

(e) The commissioner shall require a participating campus to provide the results of a student's cardiovascular screening to the student's parent or guardian.

(f) Expired.

(g) The commissioner may adopt rules necessary to administer this section.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1371 (S.B. 7), Sec. 6, eff. June 15, 2007.

Renumbered from Education Code, Section 38.019 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(6), eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 38.019. IMMUNIZATION AWARENESS PROGRAM. (a) A school district that maintains an Internet website shall post prominently on the website:

(1) a list, in English and Spanish, of:

(A) the immunizations required for admission to public school by rules of the Department of State Health Services adopted under Section 38.001;

(B) any immunizations or vaccines recommended for public school students by the Department of State Health Services; and

(C) health clinics in the district that offer the influenza vaccine, to the extent those clinics are known to the district; and

(2) a link to the Department of State Health Services Internet website where a person may obtain information relating to the procedures for claiming an exemption from the immunization requirements of Section 38.001.

(a-1) The link to the Department of State Health Services Internet website provided under Subsection (a)(2) must be presented in the same manner as the information provided under Subsection (a)(1).

(b) The list of recommended immunizations or vaccines under Subsection (a)(2) must include the influenza vaccine, unless the Department of State Health Services requires the influenza vaccine for admission to public school.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 94 (H.B. 1059), Sec. 3, eff. May 15, 2007.

Sec. 38.021. USE OF SUNSCREEN PRODUCTS. (a) A student may possess and use a topical sunscreen product while on school property or at a school-related event or activity to avoid overexposure to the sun and not for the medical treatment of an injury or illness if the product is approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for over-the-counter use.

(b) This section does not:

(1) waive any immunity from liability of a school district, its board of trustees, or its employees; or

(2) create any liability for or a cause of action against a school district, its board of trustees, or its employees.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1139 (S.B. 265), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Sec. 38.022. SCHOOL VISITORS. (a) A school district may require a person who enters property under the district's control to display the person's driver's license, another form of identification containing the person's photograph issued by a governmental entity, or, if applicable, the person's district employee or student identification card. The person must provide the identification on request.

(a-1) A school district may eject a person from district property if:

(1) the person refuses or fails to provide on request identification described by Subsection (a); and

(2) it reasonably appears that the person has no legitimate reason to be on district property.

(b) A school district may establish an electronic database for the purpose of storing information concerning visitors to district campuses. Information stored in the electronic database may be used only for the purpose of school district security and may not be sold or otherwise disseminated to a third party for any purpose.

(c) A school district may verify whether a visitor to a district campus is a sex offender registered with the computerized central database maintained by the Department of Public Safety as provided by Article 62.005, Code of Criminal Procedure, or any other database accessible by the district.

(d) The board of trustees of a school district shall adopt a policy regarding the action to be taken by the administration of a school campus when a visitor is identified as a sex offender.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1372 (S.B. 9), Sec. 12, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 896 (H.B. 3), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 38.023. LIST OF RESOURCES CONCERNING INTERNET SAFETY. The agency shall develop and make available to school districts a list of resources concerning Internet safety, including a list of organizations and Internet websites that may assist in educating teachers and students about:

(1) the potential dangers of allowing personal information to appear on an Internet website;

(2) the significance of copyright laws; and

(3) the consequences of cyber-plagiarism and theft of audiovisual works, including motion pictures, software, and sound recordings, through uploading and downloading files on the Internet.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 751 (H.B. 3171), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 38.0231. GUIDELINES FOR USE OF DIGITAL DEVICES. (a) The agency, in consultation with the Health and Human Services Commission, shall develop and distribute model health and safety guidelines that school districts and open-enrollment charter schools may use to determine best practices for the effective integration of digital devices in public schools. The guidelines must:

(1) be based on evidence-based studies and practices;

(2) consider the needs of students with intellectual or physical disabilities;

(3) consider the potential costs of implementation of the guidelines and affordable ways to reduce the hazards associated with the extended use of digital devices; and

(4) address:

(A) digital device use for varying age ranges and developmental levels;

(B) the amount of time a student spends using digital devices in the classroom;

(C) appropriate frequency for breaks from the use of digital devices;

(D) physical positioning of digital devices in the classroom;

(E) the use of digital devices to complete homework assignments;

(F) recommended total daily screen time usage for students;

(G) recommended practices or software to block access to inappropriate content; and

(H) recommended teacher training regarding digital device use in the classroom to ensure implementation of the best practices.

(b) The school board of each school district or the governing body of each open-enrollment charter school shall adopt a policy for the effective integration of digital devices in the district or school. In adopting the policy, the school board or the governing body may decide whether to adopt the guidelines developed under Subsection (a) for use in the district or school.

(c) Each school district or open-enrollment charter school that adopts the guidelines developed under Subsection (a) may implement the guidelines in a manner that best meets the district's or charter school's individual needs and the individual needs of students in the district or school, including students with intellectual or physical disabilities.

(d) If a school district or open-enrollment charter school adopts the guidelines developed under Subsection (a), the district or charter school shall post the guidelines publicly on the district's or charter school's Internet website.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 491 (H.B. 3489), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 38.024. INSURANCE AGAINST STUDENT INJURIES. (a) In compliance with this section, the board of trustees of a school district may obtain insurance against bodily injuries sustained by students while training for or engaging in interschool athletic competition or while engaging in school-sponsored activities.

(b) The amount of insurance to be obtained must be in keeping with the financial condition of the school district and may not exceed the amount that, in the opinion of the board of trustees, is reasonably necessary to afford adequate medical treatment of injured students.

(c) The insurance authorized by this section must be obtained from a reliable insurance company authorized to do business in this state and must be on forms approved by the commissioner of insurance.

(d) The cost of the insurance is a legitimate part of the total cost of operating the school district.

(e) The failure of any board of trustees to carry the insurance authorized by this section may not be construed as placing any legal liability on the school district or its officers, agents, or employees for any injury that results.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 534, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Transferred from Education Code, Section 33.085 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 7.004(a), eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 7.004(b), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 92 (H.B. 744), Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2015.

Sec. 38.026. GRANT PROGRAM FOR BEST PRACTICES IN NUTRITION EDUCATION. (a) The Department of Agriculture shall develop a program under which the department awards grants to public school campuses for best practices in nutrition education.

(b) The Department of Agriculture may solicit and accept gifts, grants, and donations from any public or private source for the purposes of this section.

(c) The Department of Agriculture may adopt rules as necessary to administer a grant program established under this section.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 728 (S.B. 282), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 38.027. ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION POLICY. (a) In this section, "electronic communication" means any communication facilitated by the use of any electronic device, including a telephone, cellular telephone, computer, computer network, personal data assistant, or pager. The term includes e-mails, text messages, instant messages, and any communications made through an Internet website, including a social media website or a social networking website.

(b) A school district shall adopt a written policy concerning electronic communications between a school employee and a student enrolled in the district.

(c) The policy adopted under this section must:

(1) include provisions designed to prevent improper electronic communications between a school employee and a student;

(2) allow a school employee to elect to not disclose to students the employee's personal telephone number or e-mail address; and

(3) include provisions instructing a school employee about the proper method for notifying appropriate local administrators about an incident in which a student engages in improper communications with the school employee.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 178 (S.B. 7), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 38.030. TRAUMATIC INJURY RESPONSE PROTOCOL. (a) Each school district and open-enrollment charter school shall develop and annually make available a protocol for school employees and volunteers to follow in the event of a traumatic injury.

(b) The protocol required under this section must:

(1) provide for a school district or open-enrollment charter school to maintain and make available to school employees and volunteers bleeding control stations, as described by Subsection (d), for use in the event of a traumatic injury involving blood loss;

(2) ensure that bleeding control stations are stored in easily accessible areas of the campus that are selected by the district's school safety and security committee or the charter school's governing body;

(3) require that agency-approved training on the use of a bleeding control station in the event of an injury to another person be provided to:

(A) each school district peace officer commissioned under Section 37.081 or school security personnel employed under that section who provides security services at the campus;

(B) each school resource officer who provides law enforcement at the campus; and

(C) all other district or school personnel who may be reasonably expected to use a bleeding control station; and

(4) require the district or charter school to annually offer instruction on the use of a bleeding control station from a school resource officer or other appropriate district or school personnel who has received the training under Subdivision (3) to students enrolled at the campus in grade seven or higher.

(c) A district's school safety and security committee or the charter school's governing body may select, as easily accessible areas of the campus at which bleeding control stations may be stored, areas of the campus where automated external defibrillators are stored.

(d) A bleeding control station required under this section must contain all of the following required supplies in quantities determined appropriate by the superintendent of the district or the director of the school:

(1) tourniquets approved for use in battlefield trauma care by the armed forces of the United States;

(2) chest seals;

(3) compression bandages;

(4) bleeding control bandages;

(5) space emergency blankets;

(6) latex-free gloves;

(7) markers;

(8) scissors; and

(9) instructional documents developed by the American College of Surgeons or the United States Department of Homeland Security detailing methods to prevent blood loss following a traumatic event.

(e) In addition to the items listed under Subsection (d), a school district or open-enrollment charter school may also include in a bleeding control station any medical material or equipment that:

(1) may be readily stored in a bleeding control station;

(2) may be used to adequately treat an injury involving traumatic blood loss; and

(3) is approved by local law enforcement or emergency medical services personnel.

(f) To satisfy the training requirement of Subsection (b)(3), the agency may approve a course of instruction that has been developed or endorsed by:

(1) the American College of Surgeons or a similar organization; or

(2) the emergency medicine department of a health-related institution of higher education or a hospital.

(g) The course of instruction for training described under Subsection (f) may be provided as an online course. The course of instruction must use nationally recognized, evidence-based guidelines for bleeding control and must incorporate instruction on the psychomotor skills necessary to use a bleeding control station in the event of an injury to another person, including instruction on proper chest seal placement.

(h) The course of instruction described under Subsection (f) may be provided by emergency medical technicians, paramedics, law enforcement officers, firefighters, representatives of the organization or institution that developed or endorsed the training, educators, other public school employees, or other similarly qualified individuals. A course of instruction described under Subsection (f) is not required to provide for certification in bleeding control. If the course of instruction does provide for certification in bleeding control, the instructor must be authorized to provide the instruction for the purpose of certification by the organization or institution that developed or endorsed the course of instruction.

(i) The good faith use of a bleeding control station by a school district or open-enrollment charter school employee to control the bleeding of an injured person is incident to or within the scope of the duties of the employee's position of employment and involves the exercise of judgment or discretion on the part of the employee for purposes of Section 22.0511, and a school district or open-enrollment charter school and the employees of the district or school are immune from civil liability, as provided by that section, from damages or injuries resulting from that good faith use of a bleeding control station. A school district or open-enrollment charter school volunteer is immune from civil liability from damages or injuries resulting from the good faith use of a bleeding control station to the same extent as a professional employee of the district or school, as provided by Section 22.053.

(j) Nothing in this section limits the immunity from liability of a school district, open-enrollment charter school, or district or school employee or volunteer under:

(1) Sections 22.0511 and 22.053;

(2) Section 101.051, Civil Practice and Remedies Code; or

(3) any other applicable law.

(k) This section does not create a cause of action against a school district or open-enrollment charter school or the employees or volunteers of the district or school.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1357 (H.B. 496), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 18, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 38.031. NOTICE OF LICE. (a) The board of trustees of an independent school district shall adopt a policy requiring a school nurse of a public elementary school who determines or otherwise becomes aware that a child enrolled in the school has lice shall provide written or electronic notice of that fact to:

(1) the parent of the child with lice as soon as practicable but not later than 48 hours after the administrator or nurse, as applicable, determines or becomes aware of that fact; and

(2) the parent of each child assigned to the same classroom as the child with lice not later than the fifth school day after the date on which the administrator or nurse, as applicable, determines or becomes aware of that fact.

(b) The notice provided under Subsection (a):

(1) must include the recommendations of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention for the treatment and prevention of lice; and

(2) if the notice is provided under Subsection (a)(2), may not identify the child with lice.

(c) The commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section in a manner that complies with federal law regarding confidentiality of student medical or educational information, including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Section 1320d et seq.) and the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g), and any state law relating to the privacy of student information.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 925 (S.B. 1566), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 38.032. SEIZURE MANAGEMENT AND TREATMENT PLAN.

(a) The parent or guardian of a student with a seizure disorder may seek care for the student's seizures while the student is at school or participating in a school activity by submitting to the school district at which the student is enrolled a copy of a seizure management and treatment plan developed by the student's parent or guardian and the physician responsible for the student's seizure treatment. The plan must be:

(1) on the form adopted under Subsection (b); and

(2) submitted to and reviewed by the district:

(A) before or at the beginning of the school year;

(B) on enrollment of the student, if the student enrolls in the district after the beginning of the school year; or

(C) as soon as practicable following a diagnosis of a seizure disorder for the student.

(b) The agency shall adopt and post on the agency's Internet website a form to be used in submitting a seizure management and treatment plan under this section. The form must request the following information:

(1) the student's name and date of birth;

(2) the names and contact information of the student's parent or guardian, the physician responsible for the student's seizure treatment, and at least one other emergency contact;

(3) any medical history significant to the student's seizure disorder;

(4) the type, length, and frequency of the student's seizures;

(5) a description of each type of seizure the student has experienced;

(6) the student's seizure triggers or warning signs;

(7) the student's ability to manage seizures and the student's level of understanding of the seizures;

(8) the student's response after a seizure;

(9) the basic first aid to be provided to the student during a seizure, including whether the student needs to leave the classroom after a seizure and the process for the student's return to the classroom, if applicable;

(10) a description of what constitutes a seizure emergency for the student;

(11) a description of seizure emergency protocol for district personnel to follow in the event of a seizure emergency for the student;

(12) a treatment protocol for any medications or other procedures to be administered by district personnel to the student during school hours, including:

(A) each daily or emergency medication, including:

(i) the name and dosage of the medication and the time at which the medication is to be given;

(ii) common side effects for the medication; and

(iii) any special instructions regarding the medication; and

(B) whether the student has a vagus nerve stimulator and, if so, appropriate magnet use for the stimulator;

(13) any special considerations or precautions applicable to the student; and

(14) the signatures of the student's parent or guardian and the physician responsible for the student's seizure treatment.

(c) The care of a student with a seizure disorder by a district employee under a seizure management plan submitted under this section is incident to or within the scope of the duties of the employee's position of employment and involves the exercise of judgment or discretion on the part of the employee for purposes of Section 22.0511.

(d) The immunity from liability provided by Section 22.0511 applies to an action or failure to act by a district employee in administering a medication, assisting with self-administration, or otherwise providing for the care of a student under a seizure management plan submitted for the student under Subsection (a).

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1039 (H.B. 684), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 254 (S.B. 1506), Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 2023.

Sec. 38.033. SEIZURE RECOGNITION AND RELATED FIRST AID TRAINING. (a) A school nurse employed by a school district must complete an agency-approved online course of instruction for school nurses regarding managing students with seizure disorders that includes information about seizure recognition and related first aid.

(b) A school district employee, other than a school nurse, whose duties at the school include regular contact with students must complete an agency-approved online course of instruction for school personnel regarding awareness of students with seizure disorders that includes information about seizure recognition and related first aid.

(c) The agency may approve an online course of instruction provided by a nonprofit national foundation that supports the welfare of individuals with epilepsy and seizure disorders to satisfy the training required under Subsection (a) or (b). An online course of instruction approved by the agency under this subsection that is provided to a school district must be provided by the nonprofit entity free of charge.

(d) The agency shall adopt rules as necessary to administer this section.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1039 (H.B. 684), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2019.

Sec. 38.034. SCHOOL HEALTH AND RELATED SERVICES PROGRAM; ELIGIBILITY FOR AUDIOLOGY SERVICES. (a) A child is eligible to receive audiology services provided under the school health and related services program if the child:

(1) is 20 years of age or younger;

(2) has a disability or chronic medical condition;

(3) is eligible for Medicaid benefits; and

(4) has been prescribed the services under:

(A) an individualized education program created under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Section 1400 et seq.); or

(B) a plan created under Section 504, Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Section 794).

(b) The Health and Human Services Commission shall provide reimbursement to a provider under the school health and related services program for audiology services provided to a child who is eligible for the services under Subsection (a).

(c) The executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission, in consultation with the agency, shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1042 (H.B. 706), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated from Education Code, Section 38.033 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(8), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 38.036. TRAUMA-INFORMED CARE POLICY. (a) Each school district shall adopt and implement a policy requiring the integration of trauma-informed practices in each school environment. A district must include the policy in the district improvement plan required under Section 11.252.

(b) A policy required by this section must address:

(1) using resources developed by the agency, methods for:

(A) increasing staff and parent awareness of trauma-informed care; and

(B) implementation of trauma-informed practices and care by district and campus staff; and

(2) available counseling options for students affected by trauma or grief.

(c) The methods under Subsection (b)(1) for increasing awareness and implementation of trauma-informed care must include training as provided by this subsection. The training must:

(1) be provided:

(A) through a program selected from the list of recommended best practice-based programs and research-based practices established under Section 38.351;

(B) in accordance with the policy adopted under Section 21.4515; and

(C) as part of any new employee orientation for all new school district educators; and

(2) address how grief and trauma affect student learning and behavior and how evidence-based, grief-informed, and trauma-informed strategies support the academic success of students affected by grief and trauma.

(c-1) The training under Subsection (c) may include two or more listed topics together.

(d) For any training under Subsection (c), each school district shall maintain records that include the district staff members who participated in the training.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 24(11), eff. June 18, 2021.

(f) If a school district determines that the district does not have sufficient resources to provide the training required under Subsection (c), the district may partner with a community mental health organization to provide training that meets the requirements of Subsection (c) at no cost to the district.

(g) The commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to administer this section.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 464 (S.B. 11), Sec. 18, eff. June 6, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 5.012, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 19, eff. June 18, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 24(11), eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 38.040. FENTANYL ABUSE PREVENTION AND DRUG POISONING AWARENESS EDUCATION. (a) Each school district shall annually provide research-based instruction related to fentanyl abuse prevention and drug poisoning awareness to students in grades 6 through 12.

(b) The instruction required by this section must include:

(1) suicide prevention;

(2) prevention of the abuse of and addiction to fentanyl;

(3) awareness of local school and community resources and any processes involved in accessing those resources; and

(4) health education that includes information about substance use and abuse, including youth substance use and abuse.

(c) The instruction required by this section may be provided by an entity or an employee or agent of an entity that is:

(1) a public or private institution of higher education;

(2) a library;

(3) a community service organization;

(4) a religious organization;

(5) a local public health agency; or

(6) an organization employing mental health professionals.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 917 (H.B. 3908), Sec. 4, eff. June 17, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER B. SCHOOL-BASED HEALTH CENTERS

Sec. 38.051. ESTABLISHMENT OF SCHOOL-BASED HEALTH CENTERS. (a) A school district in this state may, if the district identifies the need, design a model in accordance with this subchapter for the delivery of cooperative health care programs for students and their families and may compete for grants awarded under this subchapter. The model may provide for the delivery of conventional health services and disease prevention of emerging health threats that are specific to the district.

(b) On the recommendation of an advisory council established under Section 38.058 or on the initiative of the board of trustees or the governing body of an open-enrollment charter school, a school district or open-enrollment charter school may establish a school-based health center at one or more campuses to meet the health care needs of students and their families.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1418, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 38.011 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 4.005, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 1.15, eff. December 1, 2019.

Sec. 38.052. CONTRACT FOR SERVICES. A district may contract with a person to provide services at a school-based health center.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1418, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 38.011 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 4.005, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 38.053. PARENTAL CONSENT REQUIRED. (a) A school-based health center may provide services to a student only if the district or the provider with whom the district contracts obtains the written consent of the student's parent or guardian or another person having legal control of the student on a consent form developed by the district or provider. The student's parent or guardian or another person having legal control of the student may give consent for a student to receive ongoing services or may limit consent to one or more services provided on a single occasion.

(b) The consent form must list every service the school-based health center delivers in a format that complies with all applicable state and federal laws and allows a person to consent to one or more categories of services.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1418, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 38.011 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 4.005, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 38.054. CATEGORIES OF SERVICES. The permissible categories of services are:

(1) family and home support;

(2) physical health care, including immunizations;

(3) dental health care;

(4) health education;

(5) preventive health strategies;

(6) treatment for mental health conditions; and

(7) treatment for substance abuse.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1418, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 38.011 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 4.005, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 1.16, eff. December 1, 2019.

Sec. 38.055. USE OF GRANT FUNDS FOR REPRODUCTIVE SERVICES PROHIBITED. Reproductive services, counseling, or referrals may not be provided through a school-based health center using grant funds awarded under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1418, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 38.011 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 4.005, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 38.056. PROVISION OF CERTAIN SERVICES BY LICENSED HEALTH CARE PROVIDER REQUIRED. Any service provided using grant funds awarded under this subchapter must be provided by an appropriate professional who is properly licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized under state law to provide the service.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1418, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 38.011 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 4.005, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 38.057. IDENTIFICATION OF HEALTH-RELATED CONCERNS. (a) The staff of a school-based health center and the person whose consent is obtained under Section 38.053 shall jointly identify any health-related concerns of a student that may be interfering with the student's well-being or ability to succeed in school.

(b) If it is determined that a student is in need of a referral for physical health services or mental health services, the staff of the center shall notify the person whose consent is required under Section 38.053 verbally and in writing of the basis for the referral. The referral may not be provided unless the person provides written consent for the type of service to be provided and provides specific written consent for each treatment occasion or for a course of treatment that includes multiple treatment occasions of the same type of service.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1418, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 38.011 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 4.005, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 1.17, eff. December 1, 2019.

Sec. 38.058. HEALTH EDUCATION AND HEALTH CARE ADVISORY COUNCIL. (a) The board of trustees of a school district or the governing body of an open-enrollment charter school may establish and appoint members to a local health education and health care advisory council to make recommendations to the district or school on the establishment of school-based health centers and to assist the district or school in ensuring that local community values are reflected in the operation of each center and in the provision of health education.

(b) A majority of the members of the council must be parents of students enrolled in the school district or open-enrollment charter school. In addition to the appointees who are parents of students, the board of trustees or governing body shall also appoint at least one person from each of the following groups:

(1) classroom teachers;

(2) school administrators;

(3) school counselors;

(4) health care professionals licensed or certified to practice in this state;

(5) the clergy;

(6) law enforcement;

(7) the business community;

(8) senior citizens; and

(9) students.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1418, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 38.011 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 4.005, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 1.18, eff. December 1, 2019.

Sec. 38.059. ASSISTANCE OF PUBLIC HEALTH AGENCY. (a) A school district may seek assistance in establishing and operating a school-based health center from any public health agency in the community. On request, a public health agency shall cooperate with a district and to the extent practicable, considering the resources of the agency, may provide assistance.

(b) A district and a public health agency may, by agreement, jointly establish, operate, and fund a school-based health center.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1418, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 38.011 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 4.005, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 38.0591. ACCESS TO MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES. The agency, in cooperation with the Health and Human Services Commission, shall develop guidelines for school districts regarding:

(1) partnering with a local mental health authority and with community or other private mental health services providers and substance abuse services providers to increase student access to mental health services; and

(2) obtaining mental health services through the medical assistance program under Chapter 32, Human Resources Code.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 1.19, eff. December 1, 2019.

Sec. 38.060. COORDINATION WITH EXISTING PROVIDERS IN CERTAIN AREAS. (a) This section applies only to a school-based health center serving an area that:

(1) is located in a county with a population not greater than 50,000; or

(2) has been designated under state or federal law as:

(A) a health professional shortage area;

(B) a medically underserved area; or

(C) a medically underserved community by the Texas Department of Rural Affairs.

(b) If a school-based health center is located in an area described by Subsection (a), the school district and the advisory council established under Section 38.058 shall make a good faith effort to identify and coordinate with existing providers to preserve and protect existing health care systems and medical relationships in the area.

(c) The school district or open-enrollment charter school shall keep a record of efforts made to coordinate with existing providers.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1418, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 38.011 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 4.005, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 609, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 9.006(f), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 112 (H.B. 1918), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 1.20, eff. December 1, 2019.

Sec. 38.061. COMMUNICATION WITH PRIMARY CARE PHYSICIAN. (a) If a person receiving a medical service from a school-based health center has a primary care physician, the staff of the center shall provide notice of the service the person received to the primary care physician in order to allow the physician to maintain a complete medical history of the person.

(b) The staff of a school-based health center shall, before delivering a medical service to a person with a primary care physician under the state Medicaid program, a state children's health plan program, or a private health insurance or health benefit plan, notify the physician for the purpose of sharing medical information and obtaining authorization for delivering the medical service.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1418, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 38.011 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 4.005, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 38.062. FUNDING FOR PROVISION OF SERVICES. A school district or the provider with whom the district contracts shall seek all available sources of funding to compensate the district or provider for services provided by a school-based health center, including money available under the state Medicaid program, a state children's health plan program, or private health insurance or health benefit plans or available from those persons using a school-based health center who have the ability to pay for the services.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1418, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 38.011 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 4.005, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 38.063. GRANTS. (a) Subject to the availability of federal or state appropriated funds, the commissioner of state health services shall administer a program under which grants are awarded to assist school districts and local health departments, hospitals, health care systems, universities, or nonprofit organizations that contract with school districts with the costs of school-based health centers in accordance with this section.

(b) The commissioner of state health services, by rules adopted in accordance with this section, shall establish procedures for awarding grants. The rules must provide that:

(1) grants are awarded annually through a competitive process to:

(A) school districts; and

(B) local health departments, hospitals, health care systems, universities, or nonprofit organizations that have contracted with school districts to establish and operate school-based health centers;

(2) subject to the availability of federal or state appropriated funds, each grant is for a term of five years; and

(3) a preference is given to school-based health centers in school districts that are located in rural areas or that have low property wealth per student.

(c) All health care programs should be designed to meet the following goals:

(1) reducing student absenteeism;

(2) increasing a student's ability to meet the student's academic potential; and

(3) stabilizing the physical well-being of a student.

(d) A school district, local health department, hospital, health care system, university, or nonprofit organization may not receive more than $250,000 per state fiscal biennium through grants awarded under this section.

(e) To be eligible to receive a grant, a school district, local health department, hospital, health care system, university, or nonprofit organization must provide matching funds in accordance with rules adopted under Subsection (b). The matching funds may be obtained from any source available to the district, local health department, hospital, health care system, university, or nonprofit organization, including in-kind contributions, community or foundation grants, individual contributions, and local governmental agency operating funds.

(e-1) A grant under this section may not be given to a nonprofit organization that offers reproductive services, contraceptive services, counseling, or referrals, or any other services that require a license under Chapter 245, Health and Safety Code, or that is affiliated with a nonprofit organization that is licensed under Chapter 245, Health and Safety Code.

(e-2) A school district, local health department, hospital, health care system, university, or nonprofit organization receiving a grant under this section may use the grant funds to:

(1) establish a new school-based health center;

(2) expand an existing school-based health center; or

(3) operate a school-based health center.

(f) The commissioner of state health services shall adopt rules establishing standards for health care centers funded through grants that place primary emphasis on delivery of health services and secondary emphasis on population-based models that prevent emerging health threats.

(g) The commissioner of state health services shall require client surveys to be conducted in school-based health centers funded through grants awarded under this section.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1418, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 38.011 and amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 4.005, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 598 (H.B. 281), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER C. PHYSICAL FITNESS ASSESSMENT

Sec. 38.101. ASSESSMENT REQUIRED. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a school district annually shall assess the physical fitness of students enrolled in grade three or higher in a course that satisfies the curriculum requirements for physical education under Section 28.002(a)(2)(C).

(b) A school district is not required to assess a student for whom, as a result of disability or other condition identified by commissioner rule, the assessment instrument adopted under Section 38.102 is inappropriate.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1377 (S.B. 530), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 8 (S.B. 8), Sec. 17, eff. September 28, 2011.

Sec. 38.102. ADOPTION OF ASSESSMENT INSTRUMENT. (a) The commissioner by rule shall adopt an assessment instrument to be used by a school district in assessing student physical fitness under this subchapter.

(b) The assessment instrument must:

(1) be based on factors related to student health, including the following factors that have been identified as essential to overall health and function:

(A) aerobic capacity;

(B) body composition; and

(C) muscular strength, endurance, and flexibility; and

(2) include criterion-referenced standards specific to a student's age and gender and based on the physical fitness level required for good health.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1377 (S.B. 530), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 38.103. REPORTING OF PHYSICAL FITNESS RESULTS. (a) A school district shall provide the results of individual student performance on the physical fitness assessment required by this subchapter to the agency. The results may not contain the names of individual students or teachers or a student's social security number or date of birth.

(b) The results of individual student performance on the physical fitness assessment instrument are confidential and may be released only in accordance with state and federal law.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1377 (S.B. 530), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 372 (S.B. 226), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 372 (S.B. 226), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 38.104. ANALYSIS OF RESULTS. (a) The agency shall analyze the results received by the agency under this subchapter and identify, for each school district, any correlation between the results and the following:

(1) student academic achievement levels;

(2) student attendance levels;

(3) student obesity;

(4) student disciplinary problems; and

(5) school meal programs.

(b) The agency may contract with a public or private entity for that entity to conduct all or part of the analysis required by Subsection (a).

(c) Not later than September 1 of each year, the agency shall report the findings of the analysis under this section of the results obtained during the preceding school year to the School Health Advisory Committee established under Section 1001.0711, Health and Safety Code, for use by the committee in:

(1) assessing the effectiveness of coordinated health programs provided by school districts in accordance with Section 38.014; and

(2) developing recommendations for modifications to coordinated health program requirements or related curriculum.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1377 (S.B. 530), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 38.105. DONATIONS. The agency and each school district may accept donations made to facilitate implementation of this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1377 (S.B. 530), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 38.106. RULES. The commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to implement this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1377 (S.B. 530), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER D. PREVENTION, TREATMENT, AND OVERSIGHT OF CONCUSSIONS AFFECTING STUDENT ATHLETES

Sec. 38.151. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Advanced practice nurse" has the meaning assigned by Section 301.152, Occupations Code.

(2) "Athletic trainer" has the meaning assigned by Section 451.001, Occupations Code.

(3) "Coach" includes an assistant coach.

(4) "Concussion" means a complex pathophysiological process affecting the brain caused by a traumatic physical force or impact to the head or body, which may:

(A) include temporary or prolonged altered brain function resulting in physical, cognitive, or emotional symptoms or altered sleep patterns; and

(B) involve loss of consciousness.

(5) "Licensed health care professional" means an advanced practice nurse, athletic trainer, neuropsychologist, or physician assistant, as those terms are defined by this section.

(6) "Neuropsychologist" means a person who:

(A) holds a license to engage in the practice of psychology issued under Section 501.252, Occupations Code; and

(B) specializes in the practice of neuropsychology.

(7) "Open-enrollment charter school" includes a school granted a charter under Subchapter E, Chapter 12.

(8) "Physician" means a person who holds a license to practice medicine in this state.

(9) "Physician assistant" means a person who holds a license issued under Chapter 204, Occupations Code.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 781 (H.B. 2038), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 38.152. APPLICABILITY. This subchapter applies to an interscholastic athletic activity, including practice and competition, sponsored or sanctioned by:

(1) a school district, including a home-rule school district, or a public school, including any school for which a charter has been granted under Chapter 12; or

(2) the University Interscholastic League.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 781 (H.B. 2038), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 38.153. OVERSIGHT OF CONCUSSIONS BY SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND CHARTER SCHOOLS; RETURN-TO-PLAY PROTOCOL DEVELOPMENT BY CONCUSSION OVERSIGHT TEAM. (a) The governing body of each school district and open-enrollment charter school with students enrolled who participate in an interscholastic athletic activity shall appoint or approve a concussion oversight team.

(b) Each concussion oversight team shall establish a return-to-play protocol, based on peer-reviewed scientific evidence, for a student's return to interscholastic athletics practice or competition following the force or impact believed to have caused a concussion.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 781 (H.B. 2038), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 38.154. CONCUSSION OVERSIGHT TEAM: MEMBERSHIP. (a) Each concussion oversight team must include at least one physician and, to the greatest extent practicable, considering factors including the population of the metropolitan statistical area in which the school district or open-enrollment charter school is located, district or charter school student enrollment, and the availability of and access to licensed health care professionals in the district or charter school area, must also include one or more of the following:

(1) an athletic trainer;

(2) an advanced practice nurse;

(3) a neuropsychologist; or

(4) a physician assistant.

(a-1) A school district or open-enrollment charter school may include any person licensed under Chapter 201 or 453, Occupations Code, as a member of the district or charter school concussion oversight team, provided that the person meets the training requirement under Subsection (c).

(b) If a school district or open-enrollment charter school employs an athletic trainer, the athletic trainer must be a member of the district or charter school concussion oversight team.

(b-1) If a school district or open-enrollment charter school employs a school nurse, the school nurse may be a member of the district or charter school concussion oversight team if requested by the school nurse.

(c) Each member of the concussion oversight team must have had training in the evaluation, treatment, and oversight of concussions at the time of appointment or approval as a member of the team.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 781 (H.B. 2038), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 365 (H.B. 961), Sec. 1, eff. June 2, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 490 (H.B. 1002), Sec. 1, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 38.155. REQUIRED ANNUAL FORM ACKNOWLEDGING CONCUSSION INFORMATION. A student may not participate in an interscholastic athletic activity for a school year until both the student and the student's parent or guardian or another person with legal authority to make medical decisions for the student have signed a form for that school year that acknowledges receiving and reading written information that explains concussion prevention, symptoms, treatment, and oversight and that includes guidelines for safely resuming participation in an athletic activity following a concussion. The form must be approved by the University Interscholastic League.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 781 (H.B. 2038), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 38.156. REMOVAL FROM PLAY IN PRACTICE OR COMPETITION FOLLOWING CONCUSSION. A student shall be removed from an interscholastic athletics practice or competition immediately if one of the following persons believes the student might have sustained a concussion during the practice or competition:

(1) a coach;

(2) a physician;

(3) a licensed health care professional;

(4) a person licensed under Chapter 201 or 453, Occupations Code;

(5) a school nurse; or

(6) the student's parent or guardian or another person with legal authority to make medical decisions for the student.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 781 (H.B. 2038), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 362 (H.B. 3024), Sec. 1, eff. June 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 365 (H.B. 961), Sec. 2, eff. June 2, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 490 (H.B. 1002), Sec. 2, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 38.157. RETURN TO PLAY IN PRACTICE OR COMPETITION. (a) A student removed from an interscholastic athletics practice or competition under Section 38.156 may not be permitted to practice or compete again following the force or impact believed to have caused the concussion until:

(1) the student has been evaluated, using established medical protocols based on peer-reviewed scientific evidence, by a treating physician chosen by the student or the student's parent or guardian or another person with legal authority to make medical decisions for the student;

(2) the student has successfully completed each requirement of the return-to-play protocol established under Section 38.153 necessary for the student to return to play;

(3) the treating physician has provided a written statement indicating that, in the physician's professional judgment, it is safe for the student to return to play; and

(4) the student and the student's parent or guardian or another person with legal authority to make medical decisions for the student:

(A) have acknowledged that the student has completed the requirements of the return-to-play protocol necessary for the student to return to play;

(B) have provided the treating physician's written statement under Subdivision (3) to the person responsible for compliance with the return-to-play protocol under Subsection (c) and the person who has supervisory responsibilities under Subsection (c); and

(C) have signed a consent form indicating that the person signing:

(i) has been informed concerning and consents to the student participating in returning to play in accordance with the return-to-play protocol;

(ii) understands the risks associated with the student returning to play and will comply with any ongoing requirements in the return-to-play protocol;

(iii) consents to the disclosure to appropriate persons, consistent with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Pub. L. No. 104-191), of the treating physician's written statement under Subdivision (3) and, if any, the return-to-play recommendations of the treating physician; and

(iv) understands the immunity provisions under Section 38.159.

(b) A coach of an interscholastic athletics team may not authorize a student's return to play.

(c) The school district superintendent or the superintendent's designee or, in the case of a home-rule school district or open-enrollment charter school, the person who serves the function of superintendent or that person's designee shall supervise an athletic trainer or other person responsible for compliance with the return-to-play protocol. The person who has supervisory responsibilities under this subsection may not be a coach of an interscholastic athletics team.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 781 (H.B. 2038), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 38.158. TRAINING COURSES. (a) The University Interscholastic League shall approve for coaches of interscholastic athletic activities training courses that provide for not less than two hours of training in the subject matter of concussions, including evaluation, prevention, symptoms, risks, and long-term effects. The league shall maintain an updated list of individuals and organizations authorized by the league to provide the training.

(b) The Texas Department of Licensing and Regulation shall require athletic trainers to obtain continuing education in the subject matter of concussions.

(c) The following persons must take a training course in accordance with Subsection (e) from an authorized training provider at least once every two years:

(1) a coach of an interscholastic athletic activity;

(2) a school nurse who serves as a member of a concussion oversight team;

(3) a licensed health care professional who serves as a member of a concussion oversight team and is an employee, representative, or agent of a school district or open-enrollment charter school; and

(4) a licensed health care professional who serves on a volunteer basis as a member of a concussion oversight team for a school district or open-enrollment charter school.

(d) A physician who serves as a member of a concussion oversight team shall, to the greatest extent practicable, periodically take an appropriate continuing medical education course in the subject matter of concussions.

(e) For purposes of Subsection (c):

(1) a coach must take a course described by Subsection (a);

(2) an athletic trainer must take a course concerning the subject matter of concussions that meets the continuing education requirements set by the Texas Department of Licensing and Regulation under Subsection (b); and

(3) a school nurse or licensed health care professional, other than an athletic trainer, must take:

(A) a course described by Subsection (a) or (b); or

(B) a course concerning the subject matter of concussions that has been approved for continuing education credit by the appropriate licensing authority for the profession.

(f) Each person described by Subsection (c) must submit proof of timely completion of an approved course in compliance with Subsection (e) to the school district superintendent or the superintendent's designee or, in the case of a home-rule school district or open-enrollment charter school, a person who serves the function of a superintendent or that person's designee.

(g) A school nurse or licensed health care professional who is not in compliance with the training requirements under this section may not serve on a concussion oversight team in any capacity.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 781 (H.B. 2038), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 6.003, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 365 (H.B. 961), Sec. 3, eff. June 2, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 724 (H.B. 2495), Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 2023.

Sec. 38.159. IMMUNITY. This subchapter does not:

(1) waive any immunity from liability of a school district or open-enrollment charter school or of district or charter school officers or employees;

(2) create any liability for a cause of action against a school district or open-enrollment charter school or against district or charter school officers or employees;

(3) waive any immunity from liability under Section 74.151, Civil Practice and Remedies Code; or

(4) create any cause of action or liability for a member of a concussion oversight team arising from the injury or death of a student participating in an interscholastic athletics practice or competition, based on service or participation on the concussion oversight team.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 781 (H.B. 2038), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 38.160. RULES. The commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to administer this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 781 (H.B. 2038), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER E. MAINTENANCE AND ADMINISTRATION OF EPINEPHRINE AUTO-INJECTORS AND MEDICATION FOR RESPIRATORY DISTRESS

Sec. 38.201. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Advisory committee" means the committee established under Section 38.202.

(2) "Anaphylaxis" means a sudden, severe, and potentially life-threatening allergic reaction that occurs when a person is exposed to an allergen.

(3) "Epinephrine auto-injector" means a disposable medical drug delivery device that contains a premeasured single dose of epinephrine that is intended to be used to treat anaphylaxis.

(3-a) "Medication for respiratory distress" means albuterol, levalbuterol, or another medication designated by the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission for treatment of respiratory distress under Section 38.208(c).

(4) "Physician" means a person who holds a license to practice medicine in this state.

(5) "Private school" means a school that:

(A) offers a course of instruction for students in one or more grades from prekindergarten through grade 12;

(B) is not operated by a governmental entity; and

(C) is not a school whose students meet the definition provided by Section 29.916(a)(1).

(6) "School personnel" means an employee of a school district, open-enrollment charter school, or private school. The term includes a member of the board of trustees of a school district or the governing body of an open-enrollment charter school or private school.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 180 (S.B. 66), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 61 (S.B. 579), Sec. 1, eff. May 22, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 294), Sec. 2, eff. May 24, 2023.

Sec. 38.202. ADVISORY COMMITTEE: ESTABLISHMENT AND COMPOSITION. (a) The commissioner of state health services shall establish an advisory committee to examine and review the administration, on a campus of a school district, an open-enrollment charter school, a private school, or an institution of higher education, of:

(1) epinephrine auto-injectors to a person experiencing an anaphylactic reaction; and

(2) medication for respiratory distress to a person experiencing respiratory distress.

(b) The advisory committee shall be composed of members appointed by the commissioner of state health services. In making appointments, the commissioner shall ensure that:

(1) a majority of the members are physicians with expertise in treating anaphylaxis, including physicians who specialize in the fields of pediatrics, allergies, asthma, and immunology;

(2) at least one member is a registered nurse employed by a school district, open-enrollment charter school, or private school as a school nurse;

(3) at least one member is an employee of a general academic teaching institution; and

(4) at least one member is an employee of a public junior college or a public technical institute.

(c) A member of the advisory committee serves at the pleasure of the commissioner of state health services.

(d) A vacancy on the advisory committee is filled by the commissioner of state health services in the same manner as other appointments to the advisory committee.

(e) In this section, "general academic teaching institution," "institution of higher education," "public junior college," and "public technical institute" have the meanings assigned by Section 61.003.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 180 (S.B. 66), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 61 (S.B. 579), Sec. 2, eff. May 22, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 206 (S.B. 1367), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 294), Sec. 3, eff. May 24, 2023.

Sec. 38.203. ADVISORY COMMITTEE: PRESIDING OFFICER. The advisory committee shall elect a presiding officer.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 180 (S.B. 66), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2015.

Sec. 38.204. ADVISORY COMMITTEE: COMPENSATION AND EXPENSES. Members of the advisory committee serve without compensation but are entitled to reimbursement for travel expenses.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 180 (S.B. 66), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2015.

Sec. 38.205. ADVISORY COMMITTEE: APPLICABILITY OF OTHER LAW. Chapter 2110, Government Code, does not apply to the advisory committee.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 180 (S.B. 66), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2015.

Sec. 38.206. ADVISORY COMMITTEE: OPEN MEETINGS. Meetings of the advisory committee are subject to Chapter 551, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 180 (S.B. 66), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2015.

Sec. 38.207. ADVISORY COMMITTEE: DUTIES. The advisory committee shall advise the commissioner of state health services on:

(1) the storage and maintenance of epinephrine auto-injectors and medication for respiratory distress on school campuses and campuses of institutions of higher education;

(2) the training of school personnel and school volunteers, and of personnel and volunteers at institutions of higher education, in the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector;

(3) the training of school personnel and school volunteers, and of personnel and volunteers at institutions of higher education, in the administration of a medication for respiratory distress; and

(4) a plan for:

(A) one or more school personnel members or school volunteers trained in the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector to be on each school campus;

(B) one or more school personnel members or school volunteers trained in the administration of medication for respiratory distress to be on each school campus;

(C) one or more personnel members or volunteers of an institution of higher education trained in the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector to be on each campus of an institution of higher education; and

(D) one or more personnel members or volunteers of an institution of higher education trained in the administration of medication for respiratory distress to be on each campus of an institution of higher education.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 180 (S.B. 66), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 206 (S.B. 1367), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 294), Sec. 4, eff. May 24, 2023.

Sec. 38.208. MAINTENANCE AND ADMINISTRATION OF EPINEPHRINE AUTO-INJECTORS AND MEDICATION FOR RESPIRATORY DISTRESS. (a) Each school district, open-enrollment charter school, and private school may adopt and implement a policy regarding the maintenance, administration, and disposal of epinephrine auto-injectors at each campus in the district or school.

(a-1) Each school district, open-enrollment charter school, and private school may adopt and implement a policy regarding the maintenance, administration, and disposal of medication for respiratory distress at each campus in the district or school.

(b) If a policy is adopted under Subsection (a), the policy:

(1) must provide that school personnel and school volunteers who are authorized and trained may administer an epinephrine auto-injector to a person who is reasonably believed to be experiencing anaphylaxis on a school campus; and

(2) may provide that school personnel and school volunteers who are authorized and trained may administer an epinephrine auto-injector to a person who is reasonably believed to be experiencing anaphylaxis at an off-campus school event or while in transit to or from a school event.

(b-1) If a policy is adopted under Subsection (a-1), the policy must provide that school personnel and school volunteers who are authorized and trained may administer medication for respiratory distress to a person reasonably believed to be experiencing respiratory distress on a school campus, or at a school-sponsored or school-related activity on or off school property.

(b-2) If medication for respiratory distress is administered to a student whose parent or guardian has not provided notification to the school that the student has been diagnosed with asthma, the school must refer the student to the student's primary care provider on the day the medication for respiratory distress is administered and inform the student's parent or guardian regarding the referral. The referral must include:

(1) the symptoms of respiratory distress observed;

(2) the name of the medication for respiratory distress administered to the student; and

(3) any patient care instructions given to the student.

(b-3) If a student who has received medication for respiratory distress does not have a primary care provider or the parent or guardian of the student has not engaged a primary care provider for the student, the student's parent or guardian must receive information to assist the parent or guardian in selecting a primary care provider for the student.

(c) The executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission, in consultation with the commissioner of education, and with advice from the advisory committee as appropriate, shall adopt rules regarding the maintenance, administration, and disposal of an epinephrine auto-injector at a school campus subject to a policy adopted under Subsection (a) and the maintenance, administration, and disposal of medication for respiratory distress at a school campus subject to a policy adopted under Subsection (a-1). The rules must establish:

(1) the number of epinephrine auto-injectors available at each campus;

(2) the amount of medication for respiratory distress available at each campus;

(3) the process for each school district, open-enrollment charter school, and private school to check the inventory of epinephrine auto-injectors and medication for respiratory distress at regular intervals for expiration and replacement;

(4) the amount of training required for school personnel and school volunteers to administer:

(A) an epinephrine auto-injector; or

(B) medication for respiratory distress; and

(5) the types of medication that may be administered under Subsection (b-1) to persons experiencing respiratory distress, based on a review of the best available medical evidence.

(d) Each school district, open-enrollment charter school, and private school that adopts a policy under Subsection (a) must require that each campus have one or more school personnel members or school volunteers authorized and trained to administer an epinephrine auto-injector present during all hours the campus is open.

(d-1) Each school district, open-enrollment charter school, and private school that adopts a policy under Subsection (a-1) must require that each campus have one or more school personnel or school volunteers authorized and trained to administer medication for respiratory distress present during regular school hours.

(d-2) A school personnel member or school volunteer may not be subject to any penalty or disciplinary action for refusing to administer or receive training to administer epinephrine auto-injectors or medication for respiratory distress, as applicable, in accordance with a policy adopted under Subsection (a) or (a-1).

(e) The supply of epinephrine auto-injectors at each campus must be stored in a secure location and be easily accessible to school personnel and school volunteers authorized and trained to administer an epinephrine auto-injector.

(e-1) The supply of medication for respiratory distress at each campus must be stored in a secure location and be easily accessible to authorized school personnel and school volunteers.

(f) The policy described by Subsection (a-1) may not require a school district, open-enrollment charter school, or private school to purchase medication for respiratory distress or require any other expenditure related to the maintenance or administration of medication for respiratory distress that would result in a negative fiscal impact on the district or school.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 180 (S.B. 66), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 61 (S.B. 579), Sec. 3, eff. May 22, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 192 (H.B. 2243), Sec. 3, eff. May 24, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 294), Sec. 5, eff. May 24, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 294), Sec. 6, eff. May 24, 2023.

Sec. 38.209. REPORT ON ADMINISTERING EPINEPHRINE AUTO-INJECTOR.

(a) Not later than the 10th business day after the date a school personnel member or school volunteer administers an epinephrine auto-injector in accordance with a policy adopted under Section 38.208(a), the school shall report the information required under Subsection (b) to:

(1) the school district, the charter holder if the school is an open-enrollment charter school, or the governing body of the school if the school is a private school;

(2) the physician or other person who prescribed the epinephrine auto-injector; and

(3) the commissioner of state health services.

(b) The report required under this section must include the following information:

(1) the age of the person who received the administration of the epinephrine auto-injector;

(2) whether the person who received the administration of the epinephrine auto-injector was a student, a school personnel member or school volunteer, or a visitor;

(3) the physical location where the epinephrine auto-injector was administered;

(4) the number of doses of epinephrine auto-injector administered;

(5) the title of the person who administered the epinephrine auto-injector; and

(6) any other information required by the commissioner of education.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 180 (S.B. 66), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 61 (S.B. 579), Sec. 4, eff. May 22, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 597 (S.B. 668), Sec. 1.10, eff. June 10, 2019.

Sec. 38.2091. REPORT ON ADMINISTERING MEDICATION FOR RESPIRATORY DISTRESS. (a) Not later than the 10th business day after the date a school personnel member or school volunteer administers medication for respiratory distress to a person experiencing respiratory distress in accordance with a policy adopted under Section 38.208(a-1), the school shall report the information required under Subsection (b) to:

(1) the school district, the charter holder if the school is an open-enrollment charter school, or the governing body of the school if the school is a private school;

(2) the physician or other person who prescribed the medication for respiratory distress; and

(3) the commissioner of state health services.

(b) The report required under this section must include:

(1) the age of the person who received the administration of the medication for respiratory distress;

(2) whether the person who received the administration of the medication for respiratory distress was a student, a school personnel member or school volunteer, or a visitor;

(3) the dosage of the medication for respiratory distress administered;

(4) the title of the person who administered the medication for respiratory distress; and

(5) any other information required by the commissioner of education.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 294), Sec. 7, eff. May 24, 2023.

Sec. 38.210. TRAINING. (a) Each school district, open-enrollment charter school, and private school that adopts a policy under Section 38.208(a) is responsible for training school personnel and school volunteers in the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector. The training must include information on:

(1) recognizing the signs and symptoms of anaphylaxis;

(2) administering an epinephrine auto-injector;

(3) implementing emergency procedures, if necessary, after administering an epinephrine auto-injector; and

(4) properly disposing of used or expired epinephrine auto-injectors.

(a-1) Each school district, open-enrollment charter school, and private school that adopts a policy under Section 38.208(a-1) is responsible for training school personnel and school volunteers in the administration of medication for respiratory distress. The training must include information on:

(1) recognizing the signs and symptoms of respiratory distress;

(2) administering medication for respiratory distress;

(3) implementing emergency procedures, if necessary, after administering medication for respiratory distress; and

(4) proper sanitization, reuse, and disposal of medication for respiratory distress.

(b) Training required under this section must be provided:

(1) in a formal training session or through online education; and

(2) in accordance with the policy adopted under Section 21.4515.

(c) Each school district, open-enrollment charter school, and private school shall maintain records on the training required under this section.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 180 (S.B. 66), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 61 (S.B. 579), Sec. 5, eff. May 22, 2017.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 20, eff. June 18, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 294), Sec. 8, eff. May 24, 2023.

Sec. 38.211. PRESCRIPTION OF EPINEPHRINE AUTO-INJECTORS AND MEDICATION FOR RESPIRATORY DISTRESS. (a) A physician or person who has been delegated prescriptive authority under Chapter 157, Occupations Code, may prescribe epinephrine auto-injectors or medication for respiratory distress in the name of a school district, open-enrollment charter school, or private school.

(b) A physician or other person who prescribes epinephrine auto-injectors or medication for respiratory distress under Subsection (a) shall provide the school district, open-enrollment charter school, or private school with a standing order for the administration of, as applicable:

(1) an epinephrine auto-injector to a person reasonably believed to be experiencing anaphylaxis; or

(2) medication for respiratory distress to a person reasonably believed to be experiencing respiratory distress.

(c) The standing order under Subsection (b) is not required to be patient-specific, and the epinephrine auto-injector or medication for respiratory distress may be administered to a person without a previously established physician-patient relationship.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, supervision or delegation by a physician is considered adequate if the physician:

(1) periodically reviews the order; and

(2) is available through direct telecommunication as needed for consultation, assistance, and direction.

(e) An order issued under this section must contain:

(1) the name and signature of the prescribing physician or other person;

(2) the name of the school district, open-enrollment charter school, or private school to which the order is issued;

(3) as applicable, the quantity of epinephrine auto-injectors or the quantity and types of medications for respiratory distress to be obtained and maintained under the order; and

(4) the date of issue.

(f) A pharmacist may dispense an epinephrine auto-injector or medication for respiratory distress to a school district, open-enrollment charter school, or private school without requiring the name or any other identifying information relating to the user.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 180 (S.B. 66), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 61 (S.B. 579), Sec. 6, eff. May 22, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 192 (H.B. 2243), Sec. 5, eff. May 24, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 294), Sec. 9, eff. May 24, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 294), Sec. 10, eff. May 24, 2023.

Sec. 38.212. NOTICE TO PARENTS. (a) If a school district, open-enrollment charter school, or private school implements a policy under this subchapter, the district or school shall provide written notice of the policy to a parent or guardian of each student enrolled in the district or school.

(b) Notice required under Subsection (a) must be provided before a policy is implemented by the district or school under this subchapter and before the start of each school year.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 180 (S.B. 66), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 61 (S.B. 579), Sec. 7, eff. May 22, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 192 (H.B. 2243), Sec. 6, eff. May 24, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 294), Sec. 11, eff. May 24, 2023.

Sec. 38.213. GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS. A school district, open-enrollment charter school, or private school may accept gifts, grants, donations, and federal and local funds to implement this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 180 (S.B. 66), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 61 (S.B. 579), Sec. 8, eff. May 22, 2017.

Sec. 38.214. RULES. Except as otherwise provided by this subchapter, the commissioner of education and the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission shall jointly adopt rules necessary to implement this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 180 (S.B. 66), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 61 (S.B. 579), Sec. 9, eff. May 22, 2017.

Sec. 38.215. IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY. (a) A person who in good faith takes, or fails to take, any action under this subchapter is immune from civil or criminal liability or disciplinary action resulting from that action or failure to act, including:

(1) issuing an order for epinephrine auto-injectors or medication for respiratory distress;

(2) supervising or delegating the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector or medication for respiratory distress;

(3) possessing, maintaining, storing, or disposing of an epinephrine auto-injector or medication for respiratory distress;

(4) prescribing an epinephrine auto-injector or medication for respiratory distress;

(5) dispensing:

(A) an epinephrine auto-injector; or

(B) medication for respiratory distress;

(6) administering, or assisting in administering, an epinephrine auto-injector or medication for respiratory distress;

(7) providing, or assisting in providing, training, consultation, or advice in the development, adoption, or implementation of policies, guidelines, rules, or plans; or

(8) undertaking any other act permitted or required under this subchapter.

(b) The immunities and protections provided by this subchapter are in addition to other immunities or limitations of liability provided by law.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, this subchapter does not create a civil, criminal, or administrative cause of action or liability or create a standard of care, obligation, or duty that provides a basis for a cause of action for an act or omission under this subchapter.

(d) A cause of action does not arise from an act or omission described by this section.

(e) A school district, open-enrollment charter school, or private school and school personnel and school volunteers are immune from suit resulting from an act, or failure to act, under this subchapter, including an act or failure to act under related policies and procedures.

(f) An act or failure to act by school personnel or a school volunteer under this subchapter, including an act or failure to act under related policies and procedures, is the exercise of judgment or discretion on the part of the school personnel or school volunteer and is not considered to be a ministerial act for purposes of liability of the school district or open-enrollment charter school.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 180 (S.B. 66), Sec. 2, eff. May 28, 2015.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 61 (S.B. 579), Sec. 10, eff. May 22, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 192 (H.B. 2243), Sec. 7, eff. May 24, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 294), Sec. 12, eff. May 24, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER E-1. MAINTENANCE, ADMINISTRATION, AND DISPOSAL OF OPIOID ANTAGONISTS

Sec. 38.221. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Opioid antagonist" and "opioid-related drug overdose" have the meanings assigned by Section 483.101, Health and Safety Code.

(2) "Physician" means a person who holds a license to practice medicine in this state.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1080 (S.B. 629), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 38.222. MAINTENANCE, ADMINISTRATION, AND DISPOSAL OF OPIOID ANTAGONISTS. (a) Each school district shall adopt and implement a policy regarding the maintenance, administration, and disposal of opioid antagonists at each campus in the district that serves students in grades 6 through 12 and may adopt and implement such a policy at each campus in the district, including campuses serving students in a grade level below grade 6.

(b) An open-enrollment charter school or private school may adopt and implement a policy regarding the maintenance, administration, and disposal of opioid antagonists. If a school adopts a policy under this subsection, the school may apply the policy:

(1) only at campuses of the school serving students in grades 6 through 12; or

(2) at each campus of the school, including campuses serving students in a grade level below grade 6.

(c) A policy adopted under this section must:

(1) provide that school personnel and school volunteers who are authorized and trained may administer an opioid antagonist to a person who is reasonably believed to be experiencing an opioid-related drug overdose;

(2) require that each school campus subject to a policy adopted under this section have one or more school personnel members or school volunteers authorized and trained to administer an opioid antagonist present during regular school hours;

(3) establish the number of opioid antagonists that must be available at each campus at any given time; and

(4) require that the supply of opioid antagonists at each school campus subject to a policy adopted under this section must be stored in a secure location and be easily accessible to school personnel and school volunteers authorized and trained to administer an opioid antagonist.

(d) The executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission, in consultation with the commissioner of education, shall adopt rules regarding the maintenance, administration, and disposal of opioid antagonists at a school campus subject to a policy adopted under this section. The rules must establish:

(1) the process for checking the inventory of opioid antagonists at regular intervals for expiration and replacement; and

(2) the amount of training required for school personnel and school volunteers to administer an opioid antagonist.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1080 (S.B. 629), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 38.223. REPORT ON ADMINISTERING OPIOID ANTAGONIST. (a) Not later than the 10th business day after the date a school personnel member or school volunteer administers an opioid antagonist in accordance with a policy adopted under Section 38.222(a) or (b), the school shall report the information required under Subsection (b) of this section to:

(1) the school district, the charter holder if the school is an open-enrollment charter school, or the governing body of the school if the school is a private school;

(2) the physician or other person who prescribed the opioid antagonist; and

(3) the commissioner of state health services.

(b) The report required under this section must include the following information:

(1) the age of the person who received the administration of the opioid antagonist;

(2) whether the person who received the administration of the opioid antagonist was a student, a school personnel member or school volunteer, or a visitor;

(3) the physical location where the opioid antagonist was administered;

(4) the number of doses of opioid antagonist administered;

(5) the title of the person who administered the opioid antagonist; and

(6) any other information required by the commissioner of education.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1080 (S.B. 629), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 38.224. TRAINING. (a) Each school district, open-enrollment charter school, and private school that adopts a policy under Section 38.222(a) or (b) is responsible for training school personnel and school volunteers in the administration of an opioid antagonist.

(b) Training required under this section must:

(1) include information on:

(A) recognizing the signs and symptoms of an opioid-related drug overdose;

(B) administering an opioid antagonist;

(C) implementing emergency procedures, if necessary, after administering an opioid antagonist; and

(D) properly disposing of used or expired opioid antagonists;

(2) be provided in a formal training session or through online education; and

(3) be provided in accordance with the policy adopted under Section 21.4515.

(c) Each school district, open-enrollment charter school, or private school that adopts a policy under Section 38.222(a) or (b) must maintain records on the training required under this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1080 (S.B. 629), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 38.225. PRESCRIPTION OF OPIOID ANTAGONISTS. (a) A physician or person who has been delegated prescriptive authority under Chapter 157, Occupations Code, may prescribe opioid antagonists in the name of a school district, open-enrollment charter school, or private school.

(b) A physician or other person who prescribes opioid antagonists under Subsection (a) shall provide the school district, open-enrollment charter school, or private school with a standing order for the administration of an opioid antagonist to a person reasonably believed to be experiencing an opioid-related drug overdose.

(c) The standing order under Subsection (b) is not required to be patient-specific, and the opioid antagonist may be administered to a person without a previously established physician-patient relationship.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, supervision or delegation by a physician is considered adequate if the physician:

(1) periodically reviews the order; and

(2) is available through direct telecommunication as needed for consultation, assistance, and direction.

(e) An order issued under this section must contain:

(1) the name and signature of the prescribing physician or other person;

(2) the name of the school district, open-enrollment charter school, or private school to which the order is issued;

(3) the quantity of opioid antagonists to be obtained and maintained under the order; and

(4) the date of issue.

(f) A pharmacist may dispense an opioid antagonist to a school district, open-enrollment charter school, or private school without requiring the name or any other identifying information relating to the user.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1080 (S.B. 629), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 38.226. GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS. A school district, open-enrollment charter school, or private school may accept gifts, grants, donations, and federal and local funds to implement this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1080 (S.B. 629), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 38.227. IMMUNITY FROM LIABILITY. (a) A person who in good faith takes, or fails to take, any action under this subchapter is immune from civil or criminal liability or disciplinary action resulting from that action or failure to act, including:

(1) issuing an order for opioid antagonists;

(2) supervising or delegating the administration of an opioid antagonist;

(3) possessing, maintaining, storing, or disposing of an opioid antagonist;

(4) prescribing an opioid antagonist;

(5) dispensing an opioid antagonist;

(6) administering, or assisting in administering, an opioid antagonist;

(7) providing, or assisting in providing, training, consultation, or advice in the development, adoption, or implementation of policies, guidelines, rules, or plans; or

(8) undertaking any other act permitted or required under this subchapter.

(b) The immunities and protections provided by this subchapter are in addition to other immunities or limitations of liability provided by law.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, this subchapter does not create a civil, criminal, or administrative cause of action or liability or create a standard of care, obligation, or duty that provides a basis for a cause of action for an act or omission under this subchapter.

(d) A cause of action does not arise from an act or omission described by this section.

(e) A school district, open-enrollment charter school, or private school and school personnel and school volunteers are immune from suit resulting from an act, or failure to act, under this subchapter, including an act or failure to act under related policies and procedures.

(f) An act or failure to act by school personnel or a school volunteer under this subchapter, including an act or failure to act under related policies and procedures, is the exercise of judgment or discretion on the part of the school personnel or school volunteer and is not considered to be a ministerial act for purposes of liability of the school district, open-enrollment charter school, or private school.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1080 (S.B. 629), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 38.228. RULES. Except as otherwise provided by this subchapter, the commissioner of education and the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission shall jointly adopt rules necessary to implement this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1080 (S.B. 629), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER F. MENTAL HEALTH RESOURCES

Sec. 38.251. RUBRIC TO IDENTIFY RESOURCES. (a) The agency shall develop a rubric for use by regional education service centers in identifying resources related to student mental health that are available to schools in their respective regions. The agency shall develop the rubric in conjunction with:

(1) the Health and Human Services Commission;

(2) the Department of Family and Protective Services;

(3) the Texas Juvenile Justice Department;

(4) the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board;

(5) the Texas Child Mental Health Care Consortium;

(6) the Texas Workforce Commission; and

(7) any other state agency the agency considers appropriate.

(b) The rubric developed by the agency must provide for the identification of resources relating to:

(1) training and technical assistance on practices that support the mental health of students;

(2) school-based programs that provide prevention or intervention services to students;

(3) community-based programs that provide school-based or school-connected prevention or intervention services to students;

(4) Communities In Schools programs described by Subchapter E, Chapter 33;

(5) school-based mental health providers; and

(6) public and private funding sources available to address the mental health of students.

(c) Not later than December 1 of each odd-numbered year, the agency shall revise the rubric as necessary to reflect changes in resources that may be available to schools and provide the rubric to each regional education service center.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 464 (S.B. 11), Sec. 19, eff. June 6, 2019.

Sec. 38.252. REGIONAL INVENTORY OF MENTAL HEALTH RESOURCES. (a) Each regional education service center shall use the rubric developed under Section 38.251 to identify resources related to student mental health available to schools in the center's region, including evidence-based and promising programs and best practices, that:

(1) create school environments that support the social, emotional, and academic development of students;

(2) identify students who may need additional behavioral or mental health support before issues arise;

(3) provide early, effective interventions to students in need of additional support;

(4) connect students and their families to specialized services in the school or community when needed; and

(5) assist schools in aligning resources necessary to address the mental health of students.

(b) A regional education service center may consult with any entity the center considers necessary in identifying resources under Subsection (a), including:

(1) school districts;

(2) local mental health authorities;

(3) community mental health services providers;

(4) education groups;

(5) hospitals; and

(6) institutions of higher education.

(c) Not later than March 1 of each even-numbered year, each regional education service center shall:

(1) use the revised rubric received from the agency under Section 38.251 to identify, in the manner provided by this section, any additional resources that may be available to schools in the center's region; and

(2) submit to the agency a report on resources identified through the process, including any additional resources identified under Subdivision (1).

(c-1) Not later than March 1 of each even-numbered year, each regional education service center shall provide to the Collaborative Task Force on Public School Mental Health Services established under Section 38.302 an electronic copy of the report submitted to the agency under Subsection (c)(2). This subsection expires December 1, 2025.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 464 (S.B. 11), Sec. 19, eff. June 6, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2287), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 38.253. STATEWIDE INVENTORY OF MENTAL HEALTH RESOURCES. (a) The agency shall develop a list of statewide resources available to school districts to address the mental health of students, including:

(1) training and technical assistance on practices that support the mental health of students;

(2) school-based programs that provide prevention or intervention services to students;

(3) community-based programs that provide school-based or school-connected prevention or intervention services to students;

(4) school-based mental health providers; and

(5) public and private funding sources available to address the mental health of students.

(b) In developing the list required under Subsection (a), the agency shall collaborate with:

(1) the Health and Human Services Commission;

(2) the Department of Family and Protective Services;

(3) the Texas Juvenile Justice Department;

(4) the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board;

(5) the Texas Child Mental Health Care Consortium;

(6) the Texas Workforce Commission;

(7) one or more representatives of Communities In Schools programs described by Subchapter E, Chapter 33, who are designated by the Communities In Schools State Office;

(8) hospitals or other health care providers;

(9) community service providers;

(10) parent, educator, and advocacy groups; and

(11) any entity the agency determines can assist the agency in compiling the list.

(c) The agency shall include on the list any resource available through an entity identified as a resource under Subsection (b), including an entity described by Subsection (b), that provides evidence-based and promising programs and best practices that:

(1) create school environments that support the social, emotional, and academic development of students;

(2) identify students who may need additional behavioral or mental health support before issues arise;

(3) provide early, effective interventions to students in need of additional support; and

(4) connect students and their families to specialized services in the school or community when needed.

(d) The agency shall revise the list not later than March 1 of each even-numbered year.

(e) The agency shall provide an electronic copy of the list developed under Subsection (a) to the Collaborative Task Force on Public School Mental Health Services established under Section 38.302 as soon as practicable after the list is developed or revised. This subsection expires December 1, 2025.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 464 (S.B. 11), Sec. 19, eff. June 6, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2287), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 38.254. STATEWIDE PLAN FOR STUDENT MENTAL HEALTH. (a) The agency shall develop a statewide plan to ensure all students have access to adequate mental health resources. The agency shall include in the plan:

(1) a description of any revisions made to the rubric required by Section 38.251;

(2) the results of the most recent regional inventory of mental health resources required by Section 38.252, including any additional resources identified;

(3) the results of the most recent statewide inventory of mental health resources required by Section 38.253, including any additional resources identified;

(4) the agency's goals for student mental health access to be applied across the state, including goals relating to:

(A) methods to objectively measure positive school climate;

(B) increasing the availability of early, effective school-based or school-connected mental health interventions and resources for students in need of additional support; and

(C) increasing the availability of referrals for students and families to specialized services for students in need of additional support outside the school;

(5) a list of actions the commissioner may take without legislative action to help all districts reach the agency's goals described by the plan; and

(6) recommendations to the legislature on methods to ensure that all districts can meet the agency's goals described in the plan through legislative appropriations or other action by the legislature.

(b) In developing the agency's goals under Subsection (a)(4), the agency shall consult with any person the agency believes is necessary to the development of the goals, including:

(1) educators;

(2) mental health practitioners;

(3) advocacy groups; and

(4) parents.

(c) The agency shall revise the plan not later than April 1 of each even-numbered year.

(d) As soon as practicable after completing or revising the plan, the agency shall:

(1) submit an electronic copy of the plan to the legislature;

(2) post the plan on the agency's Internet website; and

(3) hold public meetings in each regional education service center's region to present the statewide plan and shall provide an opportunity for public comment at each meeting.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 464 (S.B. 11), Sec. 19, eff. June 6, 2019.

Sec. 38.255. AGENCY USE OF STATEWIDE PLAN. (a) The agency shall use the statewide plan for student mental health required by Section 38.254 to develop and revise the agency's long-term strategic plan.

(b) The agency shall use the recommendations to the legislature required by Section 38.254(a)(6) to develop each agency legislative appropriations request.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 464 (S.B. 11), Sec. 19, eff. June 6, 2019.

Sec. 38.256. REPORTS TO LEGISLATURE. In addition to any other information required to be provided to the legislature under this chapter, not later than November 1 of each even-numbered year the agency shall provide to the legislature:

(1) a description of any changes the agency has made to the rubric required by Section 38.251; and

(2) an analysis of each region's progress toward meeting the agency's goals developed under Section 38.254.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 464 (S.B. 11), Sec. 19, eff. June 6, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER F-1. COLLABORATIVE TASK FORCE ON PUBLIC SCHOOL MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES

Sec. 38.301. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(2) "Task force" means the Collaborative Task Force on Public School Mental Health Services.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 906), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Redesignated from Education Code, Subchapter F, Chapter 38 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(9), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 38.302. ESTABLISHMENT. The Collaborative Task Force on Public School Mental Health Services is established to study and evaluate:

(1) mental health services that are funded by this state and provided at a school district or open-enrollment charter school directly to:

(A) a student enrolled in the district or school;

(B) a parent or family member of or person standing in parental relation to a student enrolled in the district or school; or

(C) an employee of the district or school;

(2) training provided to an educator employed by the district or school to provide the mental health services described by Subdivision (1); and

(3) the impact the mental health services described by Subdivision (1) have on:

(A) the number of violent incidents that occur at school districts or open-enrollment charter schools;

(B) the suicide rate of the individuals who are provided the mental health services described by Subdivision (1);

(C) the number of public school students referred to the Department of Family and Protective Services for investigation services and the reasons for those referrals;

(D) the number of individuals who are transported from each school district or open-enrollment charter school for an emergency detention under Chapter 573, Health and Safety Code; and

(E) the number of public school students referred to outside counselors in accordance with Section 38.010.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 906), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Redesignated from Education Code, Subchapter F, Chapter 38 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(9), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 38.303. MEMBERSHIP. (a) The task force is composed of:

(1) the commissioner or the commissioner's designee;

(2) the following additional members appointed by the commissioner:

(A) three parents of students who are enrolled in school districts or open-enrollment charter schools and receive the mental health services described by Section 38.302(1);

(B) one person who provides the mental health services described by Section 38.302(1) or the training described by Section 38.302(2) and who is:

(i) a licensed professional counselor, as defined by Section 503.002, Occupations Code;

(ii) a licensed clinical social worker, as defined by Section 505.002, Occupations Code; or

(iii) a school counselor certified under Subchapter B, Chapter 21;

(C) one person who is a psychiatrist;

(D) two persons who are administrators of districts or schools that provide the mental health services described by Section 38.302(1) or the training described by Section 38.302(2);

(E) one person who is a member of a foundation that invests in the mental health services described by Section 38.302(1) or the training described by Section 38.302(2);

(F) one person who is an employee of an institution of higher education designated under Section 38.307; and

(G) one person who is a licensed specialist in school psychology, as defined by Section 501.002, Occupations Code; and

(3) for any other entity the task force considers necessary, one person appointed by the task force for each such entity.

(b) Appointments to the task force shall be made without regard to the race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin of the appointee.

(c) Chapter 2110, Government Code, does not apply to the task force.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 906), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Redesignated from Education Code, Subchapter F, Chapter 38 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(9), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 38.304. OFFICERS. (a) The commissioner is designated as the interim presiding officer for purposes of calling and conducting the initial meeting of the task force.

(b) The task force:

(1) shall at its initial meeting select a presiding officer from among its members for the purpose of calling and conducting meetings; and

(2) may select an assistant presiding officer and a secretary from among its members.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 906), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Redesignated from Education Code, Subchapter F, Chapter 38 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(9), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 38.305. COMPENSATION; REIMBURSEMENT. A member of the task force may not receive compensation or reimbursement for service on the task force.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 906), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Redesignated from Education Code, Subchapter F, Chapter 38 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(9), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 38.306. MEETINGS. (a) After its initial meeting, the task force shall meet at least twice each year at a time and place determined by the presiding officer.

(b) The task force may meet at other times the task force considers appropriate. The presiding officer may call a meeting on the officer's own motion.

(c) The task force may meet by teleconference.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 906), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Redesignated from Education Code, Subchapter F, Chapter 38 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(9), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 38.307. SUPPORT SERVICES FOR TASK FORCE. (a) The commissioner shall designate one institution of higher education with experience in evaluating mental health services to serve as the lead institution for the task force. The institution designated under this subsection shall provide faculty, staff, and administrative support services to the task force as determined necessary by the task force to administer this subchapter.

(b) The commissioner shall designate two institutions of higher education with experience in evaluating mental health services to assist the task force and the lead institution designated under Subsection (a) as determined necessary by the task force to administer this subchapter.

(c) In making a designation under this section, the commissioner shall give preference to at least one predominantly black institution, as defined by 20 U.S.C. Section 1067q(c)(9).

(d) On request of the task force, the agency, a school district, or an open-enrollment charter school shall provide information or other assistance to the task force.

(e) The agency shall maintain the data collected by the task force and the work product of the task force in accordance with:

(1) the agency's information security plan under Section 2054.133, Government Code; and

(2) the agency's records retention schedule under Section 441.185, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 906), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Redesignated from Education Code, Subchapter F, Chapter 38 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(9), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 38.3071. REQUEST FOR AND DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION. (a) To assist the task force in performing duties under this subchapter, the task force, or the agency on behalf of the task force, may request data from or consult with the following entities:

(1) school districts;

(2) open-enrollment charter schools;

(3) regional education service centers;

(4) local mental health authorities; and

(5) other entities that possess information relevant to the task force's duties under Section 38.308.

(b) In requesting data or consulting with entities under Subsection (a), the task force and agency:

(1) may not disclose a student's medical or educational information; and

(2) must ensure any request or consultation complies with privacy and confidentiality of student information as required by Section 38.309.

(c) Not later than the 60th business day after the date on which an entity receives a request for data from the task force or agency under Subsection (a), the entity shall provide the requested data to the task force or agency. An entity that provides data under this subsection:

(1) may not include personally identifying information of an individual receiving a mental health service, including the individual's name or birthday; and

(2) may provide the data without seeking the prior authorization of an individual included in the data or of the individual's parent or guardian, if the individual is a minor.

(d) A person that discloses data to the task force or agency in accordance with this section is immune from civil or criminal liability for, and may not be subject to an administrative penalty in connection with, that disclosure.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2287), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

Redesignated from Education Code, Subchapter F, Chapter 38 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(9), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 38.308. DUTIES OF TASK FORCE. (a) The task force shall:

(1) gather data on:

(A) the number of students enrolled in each school district and open-enrollment charter school;

(B) the number of individuals to whom each school district or open-enrollment charter school provides the mental health services described by Section 38.302(1);

(C) the number of individuals for whom each school district or open-enrollment charter school has the resources to provide the mental health services described by Section 38.302(1);

(D) the number of individuals described by Paragraph (B) who are referred to an inpatient or outpatient mental health provider;

(E) the number of individuals who are transported from each school district or open-enrollment charter school for an emergency detention under Chapter 573, Health and Safety Code;

(F) the race, ethnicity, gender, special education status, educationally disadvantaged status, and geographic location of:

(i) individuals who are provided the mental health services described by Section 38.302(1);

(ii) individuals who are described by Paragraph (D);

(iii) individuals who are described by Paragraph (E);

(iv) individuals who are described by Paragraph (H); and

(v) individuals who are described by Paragraph (I);

(G) mental health services and trainings provided by:

(i) school districts, at both the campus and district level; and

(ii) open-enrollment charter schools;

(H) the number of individuals who were placed in a disciplinary alternative education program or out-of-school suspension or expelled;

(I) the number of threat assessments conducted under Section 37.115; and

(J) the number of reports made from each school district or open-enrollment charter school by an employee of the district or school or by a school resource officer, to the Department of Family and Protective Services regarding an alleged incident of abuse or neglect; and

(2) study, evaluate, and make recommendations regarding the mental health services described by Section 38.302(1), the training described by Section 38.302(2), and the impact of those mental health services, as described by Section 38.302(3), including addressing:

(A) the outcomes and the effectiveness of the services and training provided, including the outcomes and effectiveness of the service and training providers and the programs under which services and training are provided, in:

(i) improving student academic achievement and attendance;

(ii) reducing student disciplinary proceedings, suspensions, placements in a disciplinary alternative education program, and expulsions; and

(iii) delivering prevention and intervention services to promote early mental health skills, including:

(a) building skills relating to managing emotions, establishing and maintaining positive relationships, and making responsible decisions;

(b) preventing substance abuse;

(c) preventing suicides;

(d) adhering to the purpose of the relevant program services or training;

(e) promoting trauma-informed practices;

(f) promoting a positive school climate, as defined by Section 38.351(d), in the district or school; and

(g) improving physical and emotional safety and well-being in the district or school and reducing violence in the district or school;

(B) best practices for districts and schools in implementing the services or training;

(C) disparities in the race, ethnicity, gender, special education status, and geographic location of individuals receiving the services; and

(D) best practices to replicate the services or training for all districts and schools.

(b) The task force may consult with relevant experts and stakeholders, including:

(1) classroom teachers;

(2) school counselors;

(3) school resource officers;

(4) school administrators;

(5) school nurses;

(6) licensed specialists in school psychology;

(7) licensed professional counselors;

(8) licensed clinical social workers; and

(9) non-physician mental health professionals.

(c) In consulting with relevant experts and stakeholders under Subsection (b), the task force may not disclose a student's medical or educational information.

(d) The task force may enter into agreements with institutions of higher education or other relevant entities as needed to execute the duties of the task force.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 906), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 692 (H.B. 2287), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 5.013, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 38.309. PRIVACY OF INFORMATION. The task force shall ensure that data gathered, information studied, and evaluations conducted under this subchapter:

(1) comply with federal law regarding confidentiality of student medical or educational information, including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. Section 1320d et seq.) and the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g), and any state law relating to the privacy of student information; and

(2) may not be shared with a federal agency or state agency, including an institution of higher education, except as otherwise provided by this subchapter or other law.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 906), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Redesignated from Education Code, Subchapter F, Chapter 38 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(9), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 38.310. REPORTS. Not later than November 1 of each even-numbered year, the task force shall submit to the governor, the lieutenant governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the agency a report of the results of the task force's activities conducted under Section 38.308 and any recommendations for legislative or other action.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 906), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Redesignated from Education Code, Subchapter F, Chapter 38 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(9), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 38.311. FUNDING; ADMINISTRATIVE COST RESTRICTION; GIFTS AND GRANTS. (a) Of state funds allocated to the agency for public school mental health services, the commissioner may provide not more than 10 percent for purposes of the task force established under this subchapter.

(b) The task force may not spend for the administration of the task force more than 10 percent of any money allocated to the task force for the purposes of this subchapter.

(c) The task force may accept a gift or grant from a person other than the federal government.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 906), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Redesignated from Education Code, Subchapter F, Chapter 38 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(9), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 38.312. EXPIRATION. The task force is abolished and this subchapter expires December 1, 2025.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 906), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2019.

Redesignated from Education Code, Subchapter F, Chapter 38 by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 21.001(9), eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER G. MENTAL HEALTH, SUBSTANCE ABUSE, AND YOUTH SUICIDE

Sec. 38.351. MENTAL HEALTH PROMOTION AND INTERVENTION, SUBSTANCE ABUSE PREVENTION AND INTERVENTION, AND SUICIDE PREVENTION. (a) The agency, in coordination with the Health and Human Services Commission and regional education service centers, shall provide and annually update a list of recommended best practice-based programs and research-based practices in the areas specified under Subsection (c) for implementation in public elementary, junior high, middle, and high schools within the general education setting.

(b) Each school district may select from the list provided under Subsection (a) a program or programs appropriate for implementation in the district.

(c) The list provided under Subsection (a) must include programs and practices in the following areas:

(1) early mental health prevention and intervention;

(2) building skills related to managing emotions, establishing and maintaining positive relationships, and responsible decision-making;

(3) substance abuse prevention and intervention;

(4) suicide prevention, intervention, and postvention;

(5) grief-informed and trauma-informed practices;

(6) positive school climates;

(7) positive behavior interventions and supports;

(8) positive youth development; and

(9) safe, supportive, and positive school climate.

(d) For purposes of Subsection (c), "school climate" means the quality and character of school life, including interpersonal relationships, teaching and learning practices, and organizational structures, as experienced by students enrolled in the school district, parents of those students, and personnel employed by the district.

(e) The suicide prevention programs on the list provided under Subsection (a) must include components that provide for training school counselors, teachers, nurses, administrators, and other staff, as well as law enforcement officers and social workers who regularly interact with students, to:

(1) recognize students at risk of attempting suicide, including students who are or may be the victims of or who engage in bullying;

(2) recognize students displaying early warning signs and a possible need for early mental health or substance abuse intervention, which warning signs may include declining academic performance, depression, anxiety, isolation, unexplained changes in sleep or eating habits, and destructive behavior toward self and others;

(3) intervene effectively with students described by Subdivision (1) or (2) by providing notice and referral to a parent or guardian so appropriate action, such as seeking mental health or substance abuse services, may be taken by a parent or guardian; and

(4) assist students in returning to school following treatment of a mental health concern or suicide attempt.

(f) In developing the list of best practice-based programs and research-based practices, the agency and the Health and Human Services Commission shall consider:

(1) any existing suicide prevention method developed by a school district; and

(2) any Internet or online course or program developed in this state or another state that is based on best practices recognized by the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration or the Suicide Prevention Resource Center.

(g) Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, each school district shall provide training described in the components set forth under Subsection (e) for teachers, school counselors, principals, and all other appropriate personnel. A school district is required to provide the training at an elementary school campus only to the extent that sufficient funding and programs are available. A school district may implement a program on the list to satisfy the requirements of this subsection.

(g-1) A school district may satisfy a requirement to implement a program in the area of substance abuse prevention and intervention by providing instruction related to youth substance use and abuse education under Section 38.040.

(h) If a school district provides the training under Subsection (g), the school district shall:

(1) require completion of the training in accordance with the policy adopted under Section 21.4515; and

(2) maintain records that include the district employees who participated in the training.

(i) A school district shall develop practices and procedures concerning each area listed in Subsection (c), including mental health promotion and intervention, substance abuse prevention and intervention, and suicide prevention, that:

(1) include a procedure for providing notice of a recommendation for early mental health or substance abuse intervention regarding a student to a parent or guardian of the student within a reasonable amount of time after the identification of early warning signs as described by Subsection (e)(2);

(2) include a procedure for providing notice of a student identified as at risk of attempting suicide to a parent or guardian of the student within a reasonable amount of time after the identification of early warning signs as described by Subsection (e)(2);

(3) establish that the district may develop a reporting mechanism and may designate at least one person to act as a liaison officer in the district for the purposes of identifying students in need of early mental health or substance abuse intervention or suicide prevention;

(4) set out available counseling alternatives for a parent or guardian to consider when their child is identified as possibly being in need of early mental health or substance abuse intervention or suicide prevention; and

(5) include procedures:

(A) to support the return of a student to school following hospitalization or residential treatment for a mental health condition or substance abuse; and

(B) for suicide prevention, intervention, and postvention.

(i-1) A school district may develop practices and procedures concerning each area listed in Subsection (c), including mental health promotion and intervention, substance abuse prevention and intervention, and suicide prevention, that include a procedure for providing educational material to all parents and families in the district that contains information on identifying risk factors, accessing resources for treatment or support provided on and off campus, and accessing available student accommodations provided on campus.

(j) The practices and procedures developed under Subsection (i) or (i-1):

(1) may address multiple areas listed in Subsection (c) together; and

(2) must prohibit the use without the prior consent of a student's parent or guardian of a medical screening of the student as part of the process of identifying whether the student is possibly in need of early mental health or substance abuse intervention or suicide prevention.

(k) The practices and procedures developed under Subsection (i) or (i-1) must be included in:

(1) the annual student handbook; and

(2) the district improvement plan under Section 11.252.

(l) The agency shall develop and make available to school districts guiding principles on the coordination of programs and practices in areas listed under Subsection (c).

(m) The agency, the Health and Human Services Commission, and each regional education service center:

(1) may accept donations for purposes of this section from sources without a conflict of interest; and

(2) may not accept donations for purposes of this section from an anonymous source.

(n) Nothing in this section is intended to interfere with the rights of parents or guardians and the decision-making regarding the best interest of the child. Practices and procedures developed in accordance with this section are intended to notify a parent or guardian of a need for mental health or substance abuse intervention so that a parent or guardian may take appropriate action. Nothing in this section shall be construed as giving school districts the authority to prescribe medications. Any and all medical decisions are to be made by a parent or guardian of a student.

(o) In this section, "postvention" includes activities that promote healing necessary to reduce the risk of suicide by a person affected by the suicide of another.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1134 (H.B. 1386), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 578 (S.B. 831), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 578 (S.B. 831), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1321 (S.B. 460), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 522 (S.B. 179), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 714 (H.B. 4056), Sec. 1, eff. June 12, 2017.

Reenacted, transferred, redesignated and amended by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 1.21, eff. December 1, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 5.014(a), eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 21, eff. June 18, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 917 (H.B. 3908), Sec. 5, eff. June 17, 2023.

Sec. 38.352. IMMUNITY. This subchapter does not:

(1) waive any immunity from liability of a school district or of district school officers or employees;

(2) create any liability for a cause of action against a school district or against district school officers or employees; or

(3) waive any immunity from liability under Section 74.151, Civil Practice and Remedies Code.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1321 (S.B. 460), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2013.

Reenacted, transferred, redesignated and amended by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 352 (H.B. 18), Sec. 1.21, eff. December 1, 2019.

Sec. 38.353. SUICIDE PREVENTION INFORMATION REQUIRED ON CERTAIN STUDENT IDENTIFICATION CARDS. Each student identification card issued by a public school to a student in grade six or higher:

(1) must have printed on the card the contact information for:

(A) the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline; and

(B) the Crisis Text Line; and

(2) may have printed on the card the contact information for a local suicide prevention hotline, if available.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 550 (S.B. 279), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2021.